On the other hand, Bert Hölldobler cites dominance hierarchies in groups of wolves as one of the classic phenomena that group selection got wrong. For example: “If a wolf kills another,” as Hölldobler puts it, “it doesn’t help maintain the species. This was the argument, and it was wrong.” The simpler and correct interpretation is that both wolves are protecting their own interests, each avoiding actual fighting because neither can afford the risk. The good of the group is irrelevant.
In the meantime, here's a little touch of Spring that has made me feel a little lighter in spirit.
*Bakers Twine, buttons and ribbons from my "stash".
The way you did once
In this next scene, while you are watching this video, pay attention to
18: Minor wound on the "inner parts" of the left gauntlet.
Time passes and you begin to think about a reality check here. Maybe you hadn’t heard God because your hearing has become dull. Maybe He tried to talk to you but you turned Him off. Maybe the devil saw an open door, stuck his foot in, and started to build a strong hold or maybe you begin to think you were ‘all that’ and you really didn’t need God quite so much. After all, look at everything you’ve done.
If this degeneration into quackery and snake-oil salesmanship which is modern pharmaceutical-driven medicine were simply a lesson in what bad things can happen when Health Care is no longer a basic human right but strictly a profit-driven commodity, perhaps Americans could find it within themselves to once again free themselves from the shackles of oppression. After all, do many of not consider ourselves the very originators of freedom, independence and democracy? Have we not such great faith in these principles that we practically trip all over ourselves in our Promethean effort to export these values overseas whether we are invited to do so or not? Would we stand for less, when it comes to our own health freedom?
14. Thank goodness there are no shows about knitting on Primetime TV.
Overalll of the best photogrophys of the world in the last 100 years.
I’m back, as promised, with my first entry for the Blog Me Maybe Blogfest/Challenge.
I was going to leave it there but have to say- there's been a lot of debate about Anne Hathaway's accent in this film and, yes, it is patchy but she plays the character of Emma beautifully. I think she did an interview saying that she decided if she focussed too much on the accent she wouldn't be able to focus on the acting and I respect her choice. She really is a lovely Emma, so I just had to block out the accent. And the film introduced me to Jim Sturgess forwhich I will be forever grateful.
Jack's new primary school offers a two-year Prep program for kids that are a bit too big for kinder, but still a bit too little for fully-fledged Prep. It's a fantastic opportunity for children to learn the ropes of school, wear the uniform, and be more challenged than kinder, while learning in an environment oriented around play. Jack will have a year of learning social skills and fun activities with like-minded kids, before completing another year of more structured Prep. It is perfect for him - and it made our decision so much easier. And seeing my son this morning made me realise that he was so ready for school. Regardless of my fears or concerns, regardless of a compelling desire to phone the authors of "What To Expect When You're Expecting" and complain (Seriously, I read that book cover-to-cover with each of my pregnancies, and not once did they mention having tugging sensations at the site of the placenta up to five years after the birth. How can they have missed that one?), Jack was ready to be a Prep.
"I was brought up in Iran. I know the Iranian people very well. I know they are a peace-loving people who know how to welcome guests. The Iranian government expresses the exact opposite of the Iranian people," he told AFP.
Woodward
Only selected humans can get past twenty thousand light years in exploring the universe. Most go insane. Those that can survive the trip are called Golden. They’re considered either stupid or mean.
- Taso
abuse. The CARA numbers yield a total of 5% of diocesan priests from
5. Many times, I am so lost in my thoughts that I don’t listen to people around me (okay okay husband, I see you nodding your head in affirmation.)
" I know how to do a table!"
As of now, even without this ruling, most people who are sent to death row can look forward to twenty years of appeals before their sentence is executed. That’s enough time for many relatives of victims to die of natural causes. Whether or not capital punishment is a deterrent to crime may be debated. What can’t be debated is that a toothless judicial system is an open invitation to criminals who have no reason to fear society’s retribution for any crime.
The case concerns two members of the Society for the Protection of Your Constitution, one of whom, Mahomed Vawda planned to sing it at an anti-crime march in Mpumalanga last year. Another member, Willem Harmse, opposed this.
Who?: Victoria Legrand (vocalist, organist), Alex Scully (multi-instrumentalist)
Bring a pot of water to a boil, salt it generously and cook the pasta for 8 minutes; add the asparagus, carrot and snap peas and cook for 3 minutes. Check the pasta and vegetables to make sure they're cooked through but still have texture, then drain.
“Holy men of God spake as they were moved by the Holy Ghost.”
I would like to apologize that it has been so long since I have posted, but I've been busy and most of my posts aren't related to brewing since Dave has all the specifics about our beers written down in his little notebook. Muckney Brewing exists out of his kitchen since the rules committee of my household has deemed my apartment / kitchen too small. (Rules for Living With Jess Sec. 12.4 Article 15 pg. 4) I would like to give a shout to the Bearded Brewer for all of his kind words about our brews and assure him that we will be providing full ratings of his very soon. I especially appreciated that he didn't say the Dark and Mysterious was outright gross, which some people have implied. Dave and I both know that we were about 10 sticks beyond too much cinnamon. There is a lot to be said about not conducting an Imperial Stout tasting while brewing at 9 in the morning. We live and learn. I'm looking forward to the *REAL* Missionary Position as I envisioned it. It should be as big and bad as the first, seeing as how the lock was bubbling after about a half an hour.
By my fortress of pillows. I don’t want to get up.
Breakfast in bed. Two pieces of toast with strawberry jam and a cup of milk, just what I asked for.
The embargo should be lifted for at least 3 reasons:
In late 2009, the band added it's 5th and final member on keyboard and guitar, Taylor Harmon, who has always been a friend of Glorious Rebellion, but had always been in rival bands. Since the current line up of members had been set, the band has had more shows and a larger fan base than ever. They have taken the stage with some well known bands such as EleventySeven, Same as Sunday, Ghost of Maine, and Forevermore. They currently have their song "More the way you pictured it" released on iTunes, and recorded a demo that they will soon be releasing on May 7th
The seller’s identity remains a mystery, and as a slice of cake was given to each of the 650 family and friends attending the afternoon wedding reception is likely to stay that way!
Saturday (1.29.2011) - Pancakes or Waffles with leftover sausage/onions/peppers
Click here to download the 3-page file for free from Google Documents:
4) Rocket launches and drastically veers off course, crash landing near by.
At least I tried the designing stuff above.
with no problem at all.
So soft, so calm, yet eloquent,
Me: Now what?
The second thing was the whole Emily Maynard introduction. First of all, I look forward to destroying her. I can’t take how it was all about her daughter and now just because she moves the traveling sex show to her hometown doesn’t make her a good mom. Maybe she is, but after having to listen to all her problems with introducing Ricki Bobby to Brad a year ago, now what, she moves 25 meatsicles to NC. Good call. And on the veneers, totally believable and they make me nostalgic for The Mask.
I love her, I love her, I love her,
then lays herself down to die another death
Here we come to the Iranian human and universal rights record and the Iranian opposition and minorities rights and guarantees.
Socially this was a step forward from when I was a younger child. At age eight or nine, when anybody came around, I started to lecture to them about Wagner and would do a "show and tell" using LOHENGRIN or TANNHAUSER. Now, I knew NOTHING about the dramatic content of any of these operas by Wagner. But you can be sure that when the subject was Wagner's music I had become an expert after a fashion and wanted to shared my enthusiasm for this newly discovered beauty with the whole world. I was "the Little Professor" and I would point out, for example, the effect of the brass writing, and the "majesty" (my word choice) of the music. This did not go over very well, and even the parents of these children complained about my taste for Wagner and my overall manner. Wagner! Earth Wind and Fire might be more socially acceptable than Wagner because it was a best selling band, but among the racist whites I encountered this too was a problem. My relatives on my father's Southern side always would criticize me in this manner: "Mitchell why don't you got no white faces on your record covers?" was their refrain.
I think if I were to compile a book of all my sacred texts, it would be very thick, perhaps even thousands of pages, with lyrics and photos and golden fall leaves stuck between the pages ... I'd love to hear from other people about what texts they consider sacred, beyond the obvious ones.
In an election year in which inside deals are under scrutiny (with the Sestak and Romanoff scandals swirling) and establishment candidates face a hostile electorate, Crist may find there is little patience for this sort of thing. And it’s a good reminder that the GOP inside the beltway political gurus (who backed Crist) often get it very, very wrong.Some of us suggested a long time ago that Crist was the wrong guy. It was the NRSC who thought he was the right guy. They were wrong.
Our Council for Disability Awareness (CDA) research tells us that 90% of America’s wage earners rank their ability to earn an income as their most valuable financial resource. Not surprising, since income is the only source most wage earners can count on to pay for their home or accumulate savings and possessions.
Or as we lawyers say, “you’re nicked sonny.”
This is the view as if you were standing by the tree looking at our mantle and the back of the piano
Sarah posted a really great blog yesterday about her thoughts on being banded and pregnant. I remarked to her that I thought it was ironic that she did that post b/c I had been thinking a lot about things I wished I would have known and also how I think being banded has affected this pregnancy. So, I'm kind of stealing her idea with some thoughts of my own!
The deck was empty of people when they saw a third, smaller boat, known as the captain’s emergency boat, appear before them with spaces. This wooden cutter was one of the last boats to be launched. Although it was supposed to hold 40 people, it was full of clutter. Cosmo, in his courteous way, touched an officer on the shoulder and asked: “May we get in this boat?” The three were urged to board, along with two American businessmen, and the sailor in charge was ordered to “pull off” from the doomed ship as fast as possible to avoid being sucked under. There were seven seamen and five passengers aboard.
14 - Cliff Bruner - Truck Driver's Blues - 2:58
Hound gives us some great Sherlock/John moments and the best attempt at character development for Sherlock that you're going to get for any of the three stories. Admittedly, it also features Sherlock's "info dump" trick which I'm starting to get really sick of. Cumberbatch is very good at it and I realise that it's totally canon, but it's slick and superficial and annoying and when it's used in place of actual character development, it just doesn't cut it.
Virgin are also set to take over children’s health services in Devon, a contract which will include looking after terminally ill children.
You're lonely
Blessed are the merciful, for they will be shown mercy.
What was unusual for the seizure I had last Friday night was that it was in the middle of the night and I was not sure I had one, but my husband had confirmed that I did. I still feel a little exhausted from it, and it is Wednesday today. It is very hard for other people to understand what I go through, I don’t really try and explain to anyone else. This is the first time I have actually written about it.
Don't leave your choice of resolution to the last minute - take time to think about your goals, and make sure that you are mentally committed to them...
And Art Journey is such a generous sponsor for this weeks challenge.....there will be one lucky winner who can win these fabulous stampsheets from Art Journey. Check this out....
(NaturalNews) It is no longer a secret that drug-resistant bacteria are rapidly emerging and spreading all around the world as a result of the continued overuse and abuse of antibiotic drugs in both conventional medicine and industrial agriculture. But now it appears that the genes responsible for spawning these so-called “superbugs” are also spreading, and turning otherwise mild conditions such as throat infections into deadly killers.
Sewing knits has suddenly become fast and fun after learning how to use the overlocking foot on my sewing machine. Now I have pretty finished edges and don't have to fiddle with all the french seams and other finishes I use to do.
Random, semi-associated thought: Wouldn’t it be nice if we could extend to ourselves the love, acceptance and generosity of spirit that we all feel for our daughters? What kind of women would we be? And what kind women would we raise? They are important questions worth considering. Happy Day to all you Mom’s out there…
the poetic junkie is on the ground
Homosexual behavior? James Dobson and all of the other haters in this organization believe that people choose to "behave" like they are gay. They believe they can interpret their fictional book in any way that they want to interpret it and think it is okay to spread hatred and misinformation to their blind sheep. They take what they want from a book that they claim is god-inspired and use it as a weapon of hatred. Way to be like christ!!
Okay, you ready for this? At 3:00 this afternoon I told my boss a story. I had to leave early to go take care of my nephew. Oh, not because of anything to do with him. Except in my story. See, he had a doctor appointment today for shots and regular baby-type stuff (passed with flying colors, I might add). BUT, with my twisted little brain, I changed that up into my SISTER having a doctor appointment MUCH later in the afternoon and ME having to go keep an eye on HIM until she got back. Got out 45 minutes early, I did. Yeah, looks like I may never learn. But hell, what was I supposed to tell my boss? Is it really a better idea to go in there and say to her I-can't-take-it-another-minute I-have-to-get-out-of-here before-somebody-gets-hurt?
3) Pixie loves to pose for pictures, when she's in the mood! This photo shows a time when she was not in the mood. There will be other days.
Jumbo Pencil in French Fries and Iced Mocha
School Started Tuesday. I definitely thought school starting would mean getting in a better routine. Getting organized...you know, all that good stuff...
He won the contest, so I took these photos and not only printed them for the family, but took them to be laminated and mounted with a stand.
From her blog... Welcome to the 39th edition of
While the sauce cooks, drop the pasta into the boiling water and cook until done. Fresh pasta will need very little cooking time. As little as 30 seconds for angel hair. Fettucine will need about 1 minute to a 1 minute and a half.
at ease.
If you know where the digi came from, please post a comment letting me and anyone else who may read the comments, know who this adorable little bear belongs to.
Either way, Enjoy!
There was a long pause.
*i listened to two of my best friends talk about the loss of their dads and my heart ached
The people in SH look forward to my costumes and are very disappointed if I don't dress up. I have usually had long hair and once dressed up as a mail lady and since SH is touristy, not everyone could tell I was in costume and I fooled many store owners also. Over the years the costumes have become more practical since I have to be on my feet all day. The ACE costume was the true test.
ornate frame
She’s pretty in a regular girl way, but not so gorgeous she doesn’t seem approachable. She seems like someone you take A.P. English with. I feel like I could run into her at Trader Joe’s and she’d recommend some organic non-fat salad dressing and complement some piece of jewelry I have on.
Erosion
Like I mentioned before did I use a image by Whiff of Joy, the sentiment and also the little leave next to it are by Studio G, papers by My Minds Eye, Prima and Magnolia.
Forty-three-year-old Melanie Gray found Riley’s body stuffed in a television console that had been dumped in the desert. But is she as innocent as she seems?
Gai: I can’t say I really have anything bad to say about him as a character. His role in the plot was fucking stupid – being revived, really? I like how how he was revived was never actually fucking explained. And being Shu’s childhood friend, yeah that was quite terrible. And don’t forget that I never really got his motivations for doing anything like ever – something something Mana? But yeah, he’s your standard charismatic leader turned cold-blooded antagonist, kinda bland but not awful.
And as you can see the magazine is wonderful, so much colour, wonderful styling and ideas.
A marriage is a soul tie as the bible states that two shall become one. In other
family had left England and moved
2. outline the glimmer screen on another piece of paper and cut the shape out. place the newly created paper stencil on the butterfly shape on your card and sprayed the rest with delphinium glimmer mist.
I'll share an "after" shot of the candlesticks in a minute. Hang on while I describe the flower situation.
Don't go mixing up passion with someone who doesn't want to be a painted sheep.
After running the Phoenix Guard in the last tournament, I decided to bring them along again. If they are affected by Glittering Robes, they will have a 3+ AS and 4+ Ward Save. Not too bad, for an elf. The Banner of Sorcery is a must have to generate more power dice.
It was quite an experience. I tried duck! Not my favorite, but definitely worth the try. Afterward, some of us went back to my friend Laura's apartment to celebrate the end of our classes, and the beginning of the weekend. She lives in an adorable apartment with 2 frenchies, one of whom is actually my host mom's daughter! They have a rooftop terrace that looks over Bordeaux. it took my breath away! They invited over some friends of theirs, and it turned into an American/ Francais soiree. I met lots of interesting people, and could actually hold a conversation that wasn't just about where I was from! I feel like in just a few weeks, my french has vastly improved. it's a really cool feeling. And last night, a few of us went out on the Quai, which is the area that runs along the river. Lots of people hang out there, often with bottles of vin, and just chill and enjoy the beautiful view. i met lots of cool people !!! The only problem is the tram that I take to get home stops at 1, and once again I missed it, so i crashed at Laura's apartment. I have done the walk of shame more times than i'd like to admit here, wearing the same going-out outfit as the night before. Oh lala, c'est la vie!
- Please note that BB123 Slam does not have an open mic.
It’s common konwledge that exercise can decrease stress. According to the Mayo Clinic, working out can cause your body to produce endorphins and boost your mood.
So upon that Thought… we close this Episode of the “God-Game.”
Sandra Fluke is no different than Nazi Pelosi with lies, twists and turns to push Marxism on America. Pass the Bill, and then you can read it? Freeloader Sandra Fluke won’t like these words either, as I partially quote a great American Patriot. Stop the Marxism or get the hell out of the United States of America!
By the time the 90s rolled around, I went to high school, got a car, etc. and became too cool for awhile for action flicks and the like. It's a shame I was such a fickle young lad, as I missed out on some decent movies that were still coming out then. It wasn't probably until I went and saw Escape From L.A. at the theater in college that I started to sway back to my old standbys, but even then I was getting more into arthouse cinema and stuff like that because I had never been exposed to really much of anything outside standard multiplex and video store fare in my small hometown.
6. What is your bladder control like? Do you get so nervous you might piss yourself? Try some adult diapers just in case. I wear them all the time (Buy the slender size no one will notice any bulges down there.)
Y es you’re right, it’s Jack Frost’s frown.
The text stamp " a million...." is from Technique Tuesday and I stamped it with clear embossing powder. I also used a text stamp from Magnolia.
Self: “Were you calibrating it as you wrote it to see how difficult it was against standard English?”
From an extremely low base several schools in Greenwich dramatically improved their GCSE showing in 2011. Taking the % of pupils attaining 5+ A-C or equivalent GCSE’s as a metric and showing the 2010 figure in brackets there were some great results from, amongst others, Thomas Tallis in Kidbrooke - 63% (49%), John Roan in Blackheath - 51% (35%), the tremendous Woolwich Polytechnic – 67% (58%) and Eltham Green in Eltham - 48% (28%). The News Shopper story covers the fact that the new headmaster is looking to build on this and achieve 65% this year and 75% next, which would be a fantastic performance if they can do it.
ENDS.
Pimm's ahh perhaps my most favourite summer drink. In my humble opinion the perfect way to start a wonderful evening. Indeed it is the best thing to come from Kent!
“they are not men, monsieur, they are dead bodies … zombi, the living dead, corpses taken from their grave, made to work in sugar mills and fields at night”
One of the worst offenders of this crime is chinos. I can’t stand them. Whenever I am out I see loads and loads of people wearing them. They don’t look individual, they just all look the same. They are always in the same three colours: purple, dark red or beige. It makes me think they don’t have the confidence to not be a sheep and just follow the crowd. I decided to try on chinos just to see why people liked them so much and why they were so popular. Admittedly the colour was nice and they fitted my legs well but my bum looked so flat so I didn’t buy them. This could also be said about many other things like crop tops, coloured denim, leather shorts etc.
What needs to be done?
Clock: analogue and digital, world clock
We stopped for a geocache or two, picked up pizza and went to the park for a picnic and THEN the rain came in. It's rained ever since. I got SO tired on the way home with the drizzle and the sleeping family and the rub of the wipers...zzzzz...
In both portraits, the sitters are dressed in similar style – the height of late 1580s fashion. It’s interesting that the Cambridge man wears the same kind of simple but expensive lawn collar worn by the Grafton sitter - something not often seen in portraits of the time.
These are all events I know I could take the gold in, so I'm not sure if anyone would want to compete against me, but it would make for great television. Here's what I have in mind.
* Papers - Papermania and K & Co
Eldest and Middle: (long and drawn out) From their butts.
We’ve seen it become more common now a days and most recently, Ubisoft has confirmed the existence of Rayman Legends after a trailer leaked out showing gameplay and featuring the WiiU exclusive content. As a big fan of last year’s fantastic Rayman Origins, I can’t wait to get my hands on this one. It looks even better.
Like many other rural towns an evacuee receiving unit was set up in my local church hall. One of the first groups to arrive had with them a baby girl who'd been found lying in a street with no sign of anyone around her. Lots of people volunteered to take the baby home and look after her but the senior ARP officer decided to keep her in the station for a few days so that she could be properly medically examined to ensure she had not been injured in any way. Two night later a forlorn little family came in, cut, bruised, with torn clothes. having been dug out of the rubble. The oldest child was a boy of about nine or ten. Upon hearing the baby crying in another room, he shouted out:
Congratulations Dave and Rachel!!
Handsome Furs (CA)
And I was NOT exaggerating when I entitled this blog post, "I do believe that I've hit the mother of all lodes".
to photograph. I keep telling my self I would like to
After RV check-ups, shopping, packing and doing what three generations of woman do we were finally ready for our departure on Thursday at 2 p.m.
HR: It’s like saying. “Be nice.” Nice is a “relative” term. “Nice”…
With dozens of men having come before them and about 10 sitting behind them in the audience, it’s clear that systematic flaws that have lead to so many wrongful convictions. Under District Attorney Craig Watkins, Dallas County has been famously proactive in freeing the wrongfully convicted. But what’s less readily apparent is how deep the problem runs.
And guess what WE now want to do, as soon as we are able! HA!
This picture of Miss S was taken the same day - I can't believe how grown up she is looking now
even worse!!!
The last Monday of my life as a student was wrapped with a final grade of 2.75 in Media Law but who cares about grades when all you can think of is uncertainty? IN SO MANY ASPECTS.
BLITZER: Let’s take another question from the audience here. Go ahead, please. What is your name?
Bray Wanderers v Drogheda United – Friday 7.45
1. Fruit cake Recipe:
I'm excited to celebrate with my new and old followers alike. You're the ones that make blogging worthwhile. This past year has been a good one for me in terms of writing. I didn't write as much as I would've liked, but I've learned a lot about the craft of writing. As my thanks to you, I'm going to give away three books about the craft.
Advanced techniques Dewey’s lawyers submitted his case to the Colorado Justice Review Project, a program established in 2009 with a $1.2 million federal government grant that allows convicted felons to apply for DNA testing in their cases.
11. Leave to cool in tin for about 10 minutes, then turn out onto a wire rack to allow it to cool further.
Words were but wasted breath;
Stemware - Made in France purchased in Santa Fe, NM
I read this recently and it has been haunting me ever since, powerful words I think.
More on this later, along with other gallery moves.
Don’t (you) come up any higher,
Laura, the author of the original link, talks about fat, fertility, and how women are supposed to have a certain amount of fat to be able to have children. This is the marker of their ‘fitness,’ ultimately.
So I've decided to take my ACT and enroll in College since we will be here for about 3 more years it seems even though I really don't want to be here for that much longer but where ever my husband is is my home. I'm really wanting to go for X-Ray Tech I think that would be a GREAT career I just feel behind cause all my friends are already graduated and I'm just now starting but Oh well at least I'm going...
“This is the beginning of the new age. This is the threshold. This is the global initiation into the new age.
I arrived early enough to have a brunch of hot gratons and Budweiser beer. They were serving the beer ice cold, in those petite 10oz cans. I worked up quite a thirst jogging back to the beer booth every time I drained one of those little cans.
Band leaders aren’t the guys that get the glory. They give the glory – stepping out in high time to celebrate the team, to honor the school, to send a chill down your spine and rouse a cheer on your lips. It’s a generous, selfless role – and nobody played it better than George Parks.
How lucky, then, am I?
Executive Chef at Jewel Bako, NYC
Well everyone goes through tough times. I’m just perplexed about where has all this talent gone.
Whose damage no one sees
Oil - 2 tsp
What show is your biggest disappointment for cancellation because of time slot / time changes?
1 unrestrained
I am not sure who would have a bustier like this all full of flowers and glittery, but I bet whoever it is, they'd keep it in the attic so their ghosts could get their fancy on.
John set on the side of the bed, his bare feet resting mournfully on the carpet. He wiggled his toes for something to do.
Mom and Reuben met us out front. Hehe He just loves her so much! We chatted with mom, had some “fried” rice, then she headed out and we bummed around. Later we ordered pizza and slept on and off like two slackers. This was pretty much the first day of 2010 for us – we’re losers right? Sigh.
“A lot of people tend to chew up the scenery. I’m a firm believer in less is more, especially on the big screen.” (Mark Wahlberg)
I wanna make him stay up all night
p - pride
Some photos from my “daily” life in Bogotá:
Watching my kids grow and change. My husband, who has no fear of trying and who is steady, wise, and loving. S easons. Sparkly things. Orange. Chocolate chips. People who do the right thing.
You said 80 countries now have signed on to this treaty.
New York City itself has dabbled with the idea of seceding from New York State. The issue of inequitable distribution of revenues back from the State is one of the primary motivations for these secession efforts. For Staten Island, the drama could well be called "If at first you don't secede."
I am not saying gentleness is impossible for unbelievers; merely that a little more gentleness from the secular lobby might allow them a humble glimpse of what we all — whatever our beliefs — owe to our religious inheritance.
I took a step just inside the doorway, letting the dark nuzzle at my form. I could see a glass staircase unfolding under my feet. I clutched the outside of the portal, wanting to turn back, but there’s nothing to go back for. I took a deep breath, and I surrendered myself to a new door; a new opportunity…
Last week Women of Zimbabwe Arise (Woza) held a protest in Bulawayo declaring a national disaster and demanding food aid. Two leaders were arrested.
The second person was Norman Grock. Norman and I met and corresponded through a group called, Zero 2 Illo. I was immediately impressed by his imagination, characters and skill level. Norman has the rare talent of not only being able to create characters but also being able to build worlds and universes from his imagination. His work explores the young male imaginative fantasy world in a beautiful and fanciful way. After the group was over we continued to speak with one another critiquing our respective work and new pieces. We shared childhood interests and inspirations that made us want to draw. Needless to say of the group we would be the ones to geek out over comic books, fantasy, video games, MegaMan or sci-fi movies! Norman is a hard working, witty,sarcastic and intelligent individual with a heart of gold. Again, the stars were aligned for me when he expressed interest in my project.
I should say
mark to prove him.
* The tiredness ohh my the tiredness i feel like i am almost never really awake..
I am experiencing the same sort of thing in the restaurant as the corporate party crowd descends and brings with it many ‘fresh heads’ who may never have even thought to visit a restaurant like ours. This is not always a bad thing and it can even be a great opportunity to snaffle a few loyal regulars from other places around who may have been taking them for granted.
“This morning a great number of the natives came to us in their Canoes from differant parts of the Island, several of whom we had not seen before. One of these was the Woman called by the Dolphins the Queen of this Island; she first went to Mr. Banks’s tent at the fort, where she was not known, till the Master, happening to go ashore, who knew her, and brought her on board with 2 Men and several Women, who seem’d to be all of her family. I made them all some presents or other, but to Oberiea (for that is this Woman’s name) I gave several things, in return for which, as soon as I went on shore with her, she gave me a Hog and several Bunches of plaintains. These she caused to be carried from her Canoes up to the Fort in a kind of Procession, she and I bringing up the rear.
We’ve had searches for Maria, Joseph, Nancy and Dorothy (and there was some Grease thing a few years ago), I loved those shows and (with a few tweaks) would hardly change them.
$5.00/1 – Paper Jamz Guiter, Drums, or Amplifier, Target Coupon
We now jump ahead 5 months to Vol 2, #5 (Aug/45). Another double-page splash. Patsy Walker has 8 pages and Danny has been replaced by Betty Blair (5 pages), also penciled by Mike Sekowsky. James Billmyer is also again in this issue.
Garry Kilworth – The Tryst
I’m not sure…
Gauteng police spokesperson Superintendent Eugene Opperman said the matter was being investigated "with the view to possible disciplinary steps."
KUALA LUMPUR: A number of government-linked companies (GLCs) are negotiating for global settlement of all civil suits and at all level of courts against former executive chairman of Malaysia Airlines System (MAS) Tan Sri Tajudin Ramli, Bernama reported on Thursday, Aug 11.
It is easy to see how the teacher you are today has evolved from those musings, composed 25 years ago; those frustrations and heartfelt understandings about your own learning and developmental needs. Your yearning for education beyond the classroom walls is evident in your search for pedagogical wisdom, found in the writings of Gibran. You were shunted into the sciences due to the misconceptions, albeit best intentions of your mother, who believed that qualifications in this field would guarantee job security. She may have been partly correct, after all, your entry into the profession was as a maths teacher. In any case, you were right to persevere and finish that damn science degree. The again, perhaps she was wrong, and today you would be a different writer, teacher and person had you pursued a solely literary/artistic path throughout your teen and young adult years. Those chemistry labs at university just didn’t do it for you, and the calculus lectures provided no solutions to the big questions that were forming in your mind. Yet the dullness of those books may have served another purpose, balancing that love of the aesthetic and highly emotive persona with a logical and analytical framework.
I cried on the way to the doctors office and brooded the entire day and night and next day. The next day I had to return to Tx to shop for my husbands business and I hemmed and hawed and freaked out in my head but I decided that I wasn't taking any more. When I reached the border agent of the day (a very polite gentlemen that pity's me but is nice to me) I very quietly and politely told him that I'd had trouble with an officer the day before and was wondering how to file a formal complaint. I was so embarrased and I even told him I was SORRY! He thought it was funny and wanted to know who it was but I told him that I wanted to do this the right way and didn't want to enable any gossip. He kept trying but I held fast so he wrote me an orange ticket for secondary and off to park I went.
29. Pre plan lunches for the week and stick to it.
Theon Greyjoy’s story is starting to open up. There was a bit less of him with the girl on the ship (and why he was using her), and flirting with his (then unknown to him) sister, than there was in the book. His father was well played by Patrick Malahide. His castle was maybe the best to look at thus far. Nice to see Arya’s story too. Her’s is one of my favourites from the second book.
The chart table on a submarine gets to be a crowded spot. Dave Adams, Bill Greene, and the XO were crowded around the chart table with me.
Are Daubert challenges really weeding out “junk science” and “pseudoscience” in the courtroom, or could it be that they are actually scaring off good, competent experts? Given the numbers alone, one can’t help but wonder. Bullseye, a Legal Blog on Expert Topics, reports on a new study that examines the question.
(The guard exits. King takes out his sword and begins to examine it.)
-”Please Amire.You know I won’t go unless you allow me to.”
KK Downing – Producer and solos
Then the man asks, "What's the nail for?"
Like I mentioned before in the previous Inspiration Board post, Inspiration boards really help to tie in all the pretty little details and visual aspects of their big day together in a beautiful cohesive theme, so that at the end of it all, you get a gorgeous wedding, and everything photographs wonderfully because it has all been planned and laid out neatly according to a colour palette and visual theme. No more random style choices spilling across your wedding day and just getting 'so-so' photos :)
Level 11: Mastery: +32%, Accuracy: +66.
Obviously the assassination has sparked some heated discussion in our little house, but in this as many things Muslim we agree. The Navy Seals did a remarkable job executing this mission and we are both thankful that they did not try to capture him. The media would have all Americans believe that the Moslem community is in an uproar over his death and Armageddon will surely commence at this dire and traumatic news.
Basic Spelling Rules – Double the final consonant rule
by Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
If we should have unplugged.
So the protestors who have been occupying have now been served with legal papers in which the Corporation of London seek their eviction from the site. I was disappointed, whilst not surprised that their ‘spokesperson’, (keepin’ it PC), has said that there will be now abandonment of the camp and any legal proceedings will take months and will be resisted. The protestors will undoubtedly have a squadron of ‘pro bono’ lawyers ready to show support for their cause couple with the added incentive of getting their name in the press or ‘fizzog on the goggle box’.
So wedding season is coming up .. as well as vacations .. party nights down the shore .. summer time dates .. and so on .. And of course you HAVE to have a new dress for each occasion, *eek* if you wore the same dress twice, what a fashion crime!
There is a large movement within Fundamentalism today which states: “We must be about Christ’s love and not legalism and do’s and don’ts. This movement would gladly usher in contemporary worship, music and general looseness in standards–all in the name of obeying and imitating Christ’s example. Alright, let’s assume they are all genuinely convinced Christ preached such a message. (I believe this a grandiose cop-out.)
Six eyes to look outside and check the weather. Come back and report to the class.
Looking at the underside of other cars that had been craned off the track at Monza, their wear is across a greater section of plank, with no highspots of wear midway along their length.
When party affiliations don’t matter, personal manifestos should – Zeffri Yusof – 30 Dec 2011
Here are some ideas of where to go if the lunch or coffee date tells you’re there is some good chemistry happening:
- Journal: this doesn’t have to be a diary, it’s just a place to jot down thoughts, feelings, quotes, words or anything else. I like to write down questions, worries and my insights from drawing virtue cards each day.
At the Morelia Zoo, Yupi is housed in an antiquated, undersized, barren enclosure that does not satisfy her biological and behavioural needs. She is the only Arctic animal in a collection of temperate and tropical species and opportunities for viewing Yupi are extremely limited by her enclosure.
It looks like the popularity of online poker is going from strength to strength. This year’s WSOP registration numbers are higher than the year before despite doom and gloom forecasts from some analytics after the Black Friday. Online poker rooms offer players a huge number of satellites to qualify to live poker events, generous deposit bonuses and many other online poker promotions. Who knows it maybe your turn next to make a history and become the next WSOP champion?
It's generally charted against a measure of one's pulse in beats per minute -- as a person passes from calmness to alertness to fight-or-flight to blind panic, the heartbeat rises from 60 or 80 beats per minute up to... well, the chart I'm looking at tops off at 220.
That was, until we accidentally conceived. When I found out I was pregnant, I was completely freaked out ... for about five minutes. Then, I was over the moon! Jimmy was still unsettled and unsure, being the more practical of the two of us. When his brother asked him whether he was hoping for a boy or a girl, Jimmy said, "I was kinda hoping for a puppy." But soon after that, not long into the pregnancy, I miscarried. After I got over my devastation, I realized that being a mom may have been something I actually wanted after all. I just never realized it.
Here's a pic of my (very messy!) workstation . . .
“The doctors have scheduled that date but if all looks good they may hold on for another month when the babies are more developed so they can spend less time incubated,” the 32-year-old said.
Almost forgot to tell you about the fees...there is a $1 per lot or 10% fee for selling, whichever is greater. There is no cost if your item doesn't sell. So for those selling on ebay, it's a little less, for those sellig on etsy a bunch more.
And God said, Let us make man in our image, after our likeness: and let them have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over the fowl of the air, and over the cattle, and over the earth, and over every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth.
These are all ways to improve partnerships, pricing, marketing and vendor opportunities with the National. Hitting those keys areas can make the National more than just a sports memorabilia show - it can become a premier conference standard.
A Short Look Into Fireplaces
I know she’s older than Chris, but she looks so tiny with him. Is Jane supposed to be that tiny?
In 1937 Ellington returned to the Cotton Club which had relocated to the mid-town theater district. In the summer of that year, his father died, and due to many expenses, Ellington’s finances were tight. Things improved in 1938 and he met and moved in with Cotton Club employee Beatrice “Evie” Ellis. After splitting with agent Irving Mills, he signed on with the William Morris Agency. The 1930s ended with a very successful European tour just as World War II loomed.
I’ve been cleaning almost all day to make it look nice for his arrival.
our parents issues
Beth and the director of the museum think it's just vandalism, and Beth suspects Winnie has done it herself, but you don't believe it. At night you dream again of Winnie and the satyrs, and also of this woman. Now where have you seen her before?
my face’s albedo
This, our precious planet,
My kids rolled their eyes at me and starting doubting their decision to let me join their band.
So she came running to Simon Peter and the other disciple, the one Jesus loved, and said, “They have taken the Lord out of the tomb, and we don’t know where they have put him!” So Peter and the other disciple started for the tomb. Both were running, but the other disciple outran Peter and reached the tomb first. He bent over and looked in at the strips of linen lying there but did not go in. Then Simon Peter came along behind him and went straight into the tomb. He saw the strips of linen lying there, as well as the cloth that had been wrapped around Jesus’ head. The cloth was still lying in its place, separate from the linen. Finally the other disciple, who had reached the tomb first, also went inside. He saw and believed. (John 20:2–8)
my little cottage until I got a new job.
Work was stressful because I had a bully co worker and I started getting revengeful by stealing makeup and stuff.
That's a tough one. You don't want to make it impossible for those, without cash to burn, to attend the reunion. Those with money may not understand why they're stuck having a camp-out reunion. In the end, I think the wise thing to do would be to claim you have no money at all and just stay home. That way, you won't have to camp, or deal with Uncle Mike's storytelling, Aunt Mimi's drinking problem, Cousin Earl's tattooed girlfriend and her parole officer, or Grandpa's Phil's gassy indigestion.
my kids are only little once. i don't want to miss their special things because i am caught up in editing. i have to spend time with my husband i need time for myself i HAVE to get sleep i HAVE to eat. bottom line, i have to take care of myself and my family. both physically and mentally. honestly, I don't know any secrets about how this needs to be done. i only know what i try and try my best to do. that is: make my family happy, keep myself happy and keep my photo clients happy.
And with one tilt of my head, we would kiss, right in front of my entire math class.
We’d bet this finding of non-expertise would apply to HSUS in other areas, too. Looking over HSUS’s leadership, we see plenty of longtime animal rights activists like CEO Wayne Pacelle and Michael Markarian. But we don’t see a single veterinarian. And HSUS’s board only has 2 vets out of 26 members—and one of those is a longtime fringe activist.
Sitting passively, insecurity arises, tugs at our minds, and we do nothing about it. How is that possible? With the foundation that these thought forms that push us one way or antoher and their contents have no reality. They are shadows, clouds, presumptions, superimpositions. When all that arises within our minds becomes cloudlike and empty, these dynamics loose their power. This is the practice of relaxation; not just to relax the jaw, shoulders, eyes, spine, wrists but to relax the very mind that grasps at phenomena as reality, having understood the ignorance that causes appearances to be mistaken for actualities. When the body becomes a temple fortified with the understanding of mind-as-projector, one can truly relax into softness, a softness that contains within it pure potential and sky-like spaciousness.
Ether to ether was a dark holes submission of matter and energy
I will always find time to visit you and get some fresh ideas.
808 State & Björk Ooops UK/IS
APPLICABILITY OF SAFE HARBOUR PROVISIONS IN THE INDIAN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ACT
Something that challenged me for a long time was finding the beauty in myself–seeing myself as someone beautiful, whole, complete, perfect just as I am. It may not surprise you but I have quite a perfectionist streak in me and oftentimes, it gets in the way of my appreciation of myself, of the world and of others. One of the things I love about photography, about dance, about meditation and about intensely focused activities is that they let me step out of my head, see the small details and the big picture, appreciate and truly LIVE in the moment.
Of course, it would not be permissible now to decorate the walls of a public building with such images, for they are far too European, the children and fairies in them are too rosy cheeked, their lips too red and, most damningly their skin is too white.
John did say, however, that awful as he thought the book was, he found it fascinating, and several of us agreed. Ann said she found it extremely interesting as a depiction of the way those moneyed classes behaved as they travelled around Europe in that era, and I strongly concurred. Finally Trevor said that although he shared all the criticisms, he nevertheless enjoyed reading the book.
The cunning villain, Ivan Ivanovitch Sakharine (Daniel Craig), wants the model ship for himself, as it holds the key to an ancient treasure buried amidst the wreck of the actual Unicorn ship. It is up to Tintin, with the help of the hapless detective duo Thompson & Thomson (Pegg & Frost) and the eccentric drunk Captain Haddock (Andy Serkis), to foil the evil Sakharine and beat him in a race for the treasure.
Launched that shot and he was caught out there
Lord Saville's inquiry was ordered by Tony Blair in 1998 as part of a deal to persuade-Sinn Fein leaders Gerry Adams and Martin McGuinness to sign up to the Good Friday agreement that ended the IRA terror campaign.
By the way, Happy Easter! :)
You know, I had heard people talk about Michelle Bachmann but had never seen her or heard her myself (yeah, I live in a cave) until I saw Chris Matthews asking if she was hypnotized. First, I heard the exchange and then I watched it. Very strange. Hearing it, she sounded very excited about the election outcome and I could excuse her repetition because of that. Matthews? No excuses for being stupidly rude.
the crust of the Earth is far below,
He's doing exactly what he promised.
Front wing adjustment
My second project uses Theresa’s “Mountain Wilderness” set which is fantastic for those nature lovers and masculine projects! I used 3 of the stamps to create a mountain scene for this card. I distressed all the edges, used a CB emboss folder, brads and some buttons & twine to round out the “wilderness” look. I used some Copics softly to just highlight the stamp images a bit (W3,W1,YG95,C3,C1,BG32) and then added some stickles to the water to make it sparkle.
A product is bought to be used. It has to satisfy certain criteria, not only functional, but also psychological and aesthetic. Good design emphasises the usefulness of a product whilst disregarding anything that could possibly detract from it.
That I fly without wings
Dr. Dante heaved a sigh. "It's not like they wouldn't run into me eventually. Fletching's not exactly New York City." He laughed, but it sounded high and false.
This proposed reclassification would make crimes against animals more accessible to law enforcement officers, simplify and modernize language, toughen existing statutes, create new charges, and increase the maximum prison sentence for severe cases of animal cruelty and animal fighting.
- Preheat oven to 350 degrees
On July 5, 1943, the greatest land battle in history began when Nazi and Red Army forces clashed near the town of Kursk, on the western border of the Soviet Union. Code named "Operation Citadel," the German offensive would cut through the bulge in the eastern front that had been created following Germany’s retreat at the battle of Stalingrad. But the Soviets, well-informed about Germany’s plans through their network of spies, had months to prepare. Two million men supported by 6,000 tanks, 35,000 guns, and 5,000 aircraft convened in Kursk for an epic confrontation that was one of the most important military engagements in history, the epitome of "total war." It was also one of the most bloody, and despite suffering seven times more casualties, the Soviets won a decisive victory that became a turning point in the war. With unprecedented access to the journals and testimonials of the officers, soldiers, political leaders, and citizens who lived through it, The Battle of the Tanks is the definitive account of an epic showdown that changed the course of history.
Nothing in this book is really a mystery - the conclusion is essentially laid out throughout the book. The trial plays out as expected and the final verdict isn’t a surprise either. It takes much, much longer than it should, really. Too many dates and facts about Swedish government and history in politics are noted that ultimately don’t really matter to the plot or character development. Unless you are Swedish perhaps and it would help to put certain details about Salander’s case into context.
2007- Peter and The Wolf
I leave you with my favourite clip from Tony Gatlif's wonderful film about the Gypsies' thousand year journey - Latcho Drom (meaning good road or journey). I wish that all of us could be like the little boy, and cross over the railway line fearlessly drawn by the warmth and music and wonder of the folk on the other side...
rocks and roots and decaying residue of the past
I notice how much better I feel when I eat primarily veggies, even better with raw veggies (the Blood Type Diet says a diet focusing on vegetables are beneficial for A-types like me.) I try to do at least 80 percent veggies/legumes/fruits when I prepare my meals, which isn’t that difficult, but I’d like to increase the raw veggie consumption, as well.
Today is also Friday the 13th. The reason I am a believer in the weird mysteries of this day is because weird things happen every time. Today my kids slept in until 8:30am! This has NEVER happened. Its usually like clock work between 6:30-7am they rise. My daughter is not clumsy and I am but today I have missed falling over things, or getting bumps and bruises as I usually do, though my 2 year old has not stopped tripping or falling over . It's only lunch time, so I have half a day left to get through this odd day.
So that is the cross taken care of, but what about the hot? We don’t actually eat them hot that often. They were simply called cross buns, until that famous nursery rhyme was written sometime in the eighteenth century:
The Miami Herald claims that in October, he was caught with a ‘burglary tool’ – a flathead screwdriver – and 12 pieces of women’s jewellery. Martin insisted that they did not belong to him.
This was a classic case of following the crowd over the cliff.
I would like to say this again, this is not a conspiracy site, and hence what we post is only pure hard evidence, that is uncut. Now you may delete this post from fb soon, quite similar to how the government was attacking Malaysiakini using DDOS and hijacking the entire nations Twitter traffic on the 28th April, but the evidence remains the same.
he likes to push his trains down the ramp and watch them fall off the table
Liz Claiborne short boots - Goodwill (they looked new!)
Tris and her father leave Caleb, Peter, and Marcus downstairs as they go upstairs to stop the simulation. Guards find them right when they are exiting the elevator, and Tris's father lures them away, sacrificing his life in the process. Tris then encounters simulation-controlled Tobias, who is running the attack simulation from the Dauntless control room. They fight. Echoing a scene in her fear landscape, she hands over the gun as if to let him kill her, because she can't kill him. Somehow this jerks him out of the simulation, and together they stop the attack simulation, freeing the Dauntless from Erudite control.
Cause cats don't like living this way,
I think all writers bleed into their characters. Different facets are pulled back or amplified, but ultimately we’re all drawing on something inside ourselves to make these people (and griffins) real. For me, the real challenge was writing a teenaged female protagonist, given that, ya know, I’ve never BEEN ONE. But I did a guest blog over at YA Highway about it, which people seemed to dig.
Note also that you do not mail this to the same address as your tax forms, it goes here:
She dropped her few sticks of driftwood, picked up her skirts and ran back for the long house. It would take every hand to harvest this windfall. No one would mind because they’d all have full bellies tonight for the first time in over a month.
(CBS/AP) One of the most successful artists of all time, prolific painter Thomas Kinkade – the self-described “Painter of Light” – died Friday at the age of 54.
The units are designed for TIG, MIG and arc welding operations and feature a spark arrestor, flexible arm and optional custom carbon blends as well as a HEPA filter for particles.
**Cheese dip ruining my expensive peacoat.
Firstly, thankyou Taryn Browning for providing me with a copy for review! This has not affected my review in any way.
This seemingly small moment in time had somehow remained fixed, as though the day itself had just happened and all of life was yet to come. We probably all have these moments, moments that come to define us. I am very grateful that my own have not been marked by tragedy.
2 lbs. boned shoulder of lamb, trimmed and cut into 1-cubes
75 minutes spent in a windowless room with the lights dimmed inhaling the vapors and absorbing this combination of oils into the skin of my hands and forearms was enough to smooth the last 2 weeks worth of evil from my body. Amazing, seriously. My self prescribed aromatherapy regimen to truly test the efficacy of the above results will be moisturizing my entire body with these oils after a hot shower in the days prior to the arrival of my monthly visit. This will allow the therapeutic properties of the oils to be better absorbed into my skin. And of course, make the time for a long overdue massage.
—The Simpsons
Worst of all, the Police denied having anything to do with Baharuddin Ahmad’s death. Whereas dozens of witnesses testified that he collapsed in a cloud of tear gas fired at KLCC, while the police stood by and ignored his plight.
I'm sure my mum and stepdad will love it, despite the lateness of the performance. I'm sure the teenagers will love it, too. I'm sure I'd hate it as since I was 8 I've been old and cynical and unable to fit in with the crowd.
Spartacus occupies the other end of the scale – a show so riddled with plot (and tits, cock and gore) that it is thrilling, if sometimes vacant. So much is going on that it’s hard to cling to something real. Good fiction, in my opinion, occupies the space between these two – allowing character, emotion and nuance to unfold against the backdrop of a real story.
Can these protagonists save the world?
and then the pool is mine.
So,yes, it has been quite a week and I am thankful for all of it!!
Decline Push-Ups 16 knees on chair 20 full
If anything, Karl Pilkington is a bit of an old man character. Set in his ways, reluctant to try new things, fails to see the excitement in most scenarios or activities. Saying this, his attitude means he comes out with some truly brilliant, quirky, random and 'dry' quotes. I say dry because he doesn't say them waiting for a huge laugh from Gervais of Stephen Merchant, he says them cause its how his mind genuinely works and what he genuinely believes. In fact, its this which got Pilkington involved in The Ricky Gervais Show in the first place. Originally, he only produced Ricky Gervais' and Stephen Merchant's radio show on XFM, but as time went on they started to bring him onto the microphones more for his funny stories, views and the fact that Gervais and Merchant could just make fun out of him as much as they want, rile him up a bit, and make fun of him even more for how frustrated he was getting.
Sous-Chef
So I thought that we should chat... chat ideas about our boys... what they wear, what they read, what they are interested in... Help each other out and find that perfect gift... You can see what I have come up with for my boys here.... and I will add your suggestions to the pages as we go...
Eight of us set out that night. There was Sixpence the Tanner, who had never sung in his life (he just worked his mouth in church); the brothers Horace and Boney, who were always fighting everybody and always getting the worst of it; Clergy Green, the preaching maniac; Wait the bully, and my two brothers. As we went down the lane other boys, from other villages, were already about the hills, bawling ‘Kingwenslush’, and shouting through keyholes ‘Knock on the knocker! Ring at the Bell! Give us a penny for singing so well!’ They weren’t an approved charity as we were, the Choir; but competition was in the air.
Back when I have calmed down!
Drum fitted -
I’d never do that - it’d be like sexually abusing it.
DD p.61 - 64
But, in general, I’m not one to repeat a recipe that I didn’t thoroughly enjoy the first time around. Boy, am I glad that I made an exception in this case.
The main thing that I figure out the most is, I really am weak to people like them. I’m not certain why. But well, I enjoy it. I think at this time it’s already enough. (^-^)
With the most pitiful words I have to describe, because they don't do justice, I know what it is like to know the Compassionate One when it comes to the depths of my need. The times when the Lord saw straight to my heart, straight to my need, and within the problem opened up my eyes to the reality that He indeed has been...will be...and was always the answer.
Have I mentioned just how much I adore mesh and these mesh offerings by CCD are all the things I love mesh for…..the way it flows, looks and moves with your body effortlessly. I didn’t edit these photos so you will see just how lovely each item hangs and looks unedited with raw pictures…I think you’ll agree and love these mesh clothes as much as I do.
Tuesday, 24 April 2012 from 08.00-09.30
Walnut Brewery Barley Wine
This, the very thing I’m doing right now, is therapy.
The other thing that jumps out at me as a woman is the portrayal of Tatiana Romanova played by Daniela Bianchi. It seems her only talent as a Russian cypher clerk is to sit around being beautiful. She contributes nothing to the accomplishment of the mission, but Holmes assures me she is crucial to the Plot that Men Love, which is an element of all Bond movies.
There was no trace of a "t" when he said the name of his town.
We invite you to join us!
Picking a unique wedding theme for your special day is highly personal and a matter of taste-your own taste. Don't let others influence you. It is, after all, your big day, not theirs. You can pick serious themes that blend into a traditional wedding or you can choose a unique wedding theme that is going to be meaningful to you.
Wassail
Being locked into the VSTOL/STOVL operational concept means that all our naval air assets have to comform to the platform type. Including, as I've said before the Airborne Early Warning assets on board the carriers. Cue that massively over-complex and expensive to buy and maintain V-22 based AEW platform (love the program name for the radar/sensor package of TOSS) currently being mooted. We could go for a Merlin-based AEW platform, but the flaws with the airframes of boih these aircraft are well known.
A group of graduates, well established in their careers, were talking at a reunion and decided to go visit their old university professor, now retired. During their visit, the conversation turned to complaints about stress in their work and lives. Offering his guests hot chocolate, the professor went into the kitchen and returned with a large pot of hot chocolate and an assortment of cups – porcelain, glass, crystal, some plain looking, some expensive, some exquisite – telling them to help themselves to the hot chocolate.
The fiend was back at it again in the garden. We set up a trap in the garden, and hopefully we'll catch the thief and destroyer of perfectly ripened tomatoes.
Our refugee system is for real refugees not bogus ones like yourselves. We know you're actually economic migrants posing as refugees to gain quick and easy entry into shopping-mall-Canada so you can greedily pursue your materialist fantasies post haste. It's a loftier ambition to stay in post civil-war Sri Lanka and contribute to the future prosperity and stability of the nation by helping to heal the wounds made by ethnic rivalries. This will greatly benefit the lives of future generations of Sri Lankans. But who cares about them? F**k 'em, as they say. You only care about yourself. You want stuff and you want it now which is why you decided to make a refugee claim in Canada even though you really aren't one.
Ford
"You look gorgeous, Blue! We're definitely buying these," exclaimed Harriet. Then she led Bluebelle back to the counter where P. J. Collie stood. All of the other Webkinz were still looking for clothes, so there wasn't any line.
I explained we didn't have the money right then, but we could set things in motion and work out ways to save.
07. How Can A Poor Man Stand Such Times And Live?
First of all, WATER FEATURES! Our new house has not one, not two, but THREE fountains (okay, so one is actually a man-made waterfall.) This "selling point" has translated into a good deal of labor. I am proud to say that we finally have all three up and running!
In the weeks leading up to this moment, many people have offered suggestions as to what I should say to you. Some said I should plead for mercy in hopes of a light sentence, while others suggested I would be hit hard either way. But what I want to do is just talk about myself for a few minutes.
Woe vnto woe vnto woe
"I'm sorry Black Pudding".
Where to Find Logo Artwork/Guidelines
Although it has been a fair and pleasant day to say my goodbyes to the family, we all had lunch together at our usual watering hole, then went our separate ways.
Card games such as Crazy Eights, Old Maid, Black Jack, Slap the Jack and Concentration.
Sharperson died in a car accident in 1996 while driving to San Diego to join the Padres after being recalled. He was 34.
August 25: Dead daisies.
Okay, call me crazy ..( I can hear you dear...)..but the synopsis doesn't sound that bad..even with the fact that I will suspend my disbelief at the thought of Rhianna being considered an actress.
I have a FS Amber irregularly, but I check in at least once a year. I don't think I've ever had the beer on cask, though, and it was a revelation. It was served with Tyrconnell Single Malt, a whiskey akin to a gentle Speyside, but sweeter in the Irish fashion, and Oyster Isobella and a beet slaw. Amber is a thoroughly America beer, but its lineage is much in keeping with the gentler session ales of the UK. On cask, the malt was smooth and creamy, a perfect base for the slightly sweet, fresh, fruity American hops. Some malts manage to communicate the quality of the fresh, lively springs that feed their distilleries. Cask Amber does, too. I originally frowned when I saw Amber on the menu, but it was an inspired choice--Harris recognized what a perfect complement it was to the whiskey and salad.
Facebook: www.facebook.com/itpilipinas
30The God of our fathers gave Jesus back to life, whom you had put to death, hanging him on a tree.
In most shopping mall now in Kuala Lumpur we can find a Nasi Ayam Penyek outlet or loosely translated as Smash Chicken Rice.Smash Chicken Rice or Nasi Ayam Penyek is of Indonesian origin. A friend gave me the recipe recently and so I am sharing it with you. The recipe consists of the rice, the chicken, the tofu and tempe or fermented soya bean, the soup and the chilli sauce.
On the nose - Zingy gooseberry hops, subtle biscuit malts.
TIP #6 - DRY THE BEANS THOROUGHLY Wet beans = watery casserole = NOT GOOD. Even if you happen to be using frozen green beans, don't skip this step, it makes all the difference. Arrange the beans in a single layer on a double layer of paper towels.
I met two men at the Indy 500 Festival Parade. One was yelling, “We love you Anderson Cooper!” and the other was crocheting pink flowers. By the end of the parade I became their official photographer for the Gay Pride Parade coming up this Saturday. So last Sunday I went to their house to photograph the outfits they made for their walking group, Pink Pride. They live in this fabulous condo and have painted the walls the color of Mardi Gras; gold, purple, and green. Stunning. Then I went upstairs and entered a room exploding in pink; beads, netting, chiffon, and OMG the outfits. So surreal. So beautiful.
In this case, "limited resources" meant a camcorder and a dream.
Then I took the YR02 again and blended in circles with the side of my brush tip just as I did with the first petal, with the same amount of time and effort. Now you can see a big different between the two petals - the first still has harsh lines and the second has a smooth blend.
And…who else would do this?
Tag - sizzix
True Blue is not beautiful. It's gritty and bitter and sensitive and unflinching - both ripped from the headlines and totally unique. The mystery kept me guessing, and the characters kept me up late (even though I should have been sleeping, due to the demon cold virus from hell).
And I'm like
Surveys, focus groups and interviews of students were used to help redesign the library space. Dr. Cindy Beacham helped with Mary with the design process. Also they were able to enlist faculty to help. One faculty brought her entire class for a focus group.
Also - I've got four copies of Pearl Girls: Encountering Grit, Experiencing Grace to give away. I have randomly selected four winners from those who entered to win the necklace.
they may endorse it over to America,
“In the world of publishing it is becoming desirable for new authors to get on the publishing ladder and attain success with their books. The current economic climate has opened many avenues in publishing which has allowed us to take on a large number of new writers through both Traditional Mainstream and Partnership Opportunities, which includes a full editorial, production and marketing plan. We understand new writers can become disheartened when rejected by publishers. Our view is, and always has been, that as one door closes another opens.”
Yesterday, while grocery shopping I found that blue poinsettia (first picture above) and this Christmas cactus on sale. Never saw a blue poinsettia before, so it had to come home with me. Our little Christmas tree is blue and silver. My mother had a Christmas cactus when I was little. Her's was a bright pink. They had plenty of those, but only one of this white and pale pink. It was different, so it came along too. That is the extent of my Christmas decorating.
After weeks of campaign in the media that Nato-led forces are ‘coming to get you’, US military officials have finally announced that a ‘major offensive’ against the Taliban has begun around Marjah town in Helmand province.
J.Crew's been edging its way into the world of weddings for a few years. They've established themselves as the go-to bridesmaid dress catalog, but today they opened their first full-fledged bridal boutique at 769 Madison Avenue in NYC---and it's already packed.
The cities I loved so well I abandon’d and left, I sped to the
“And the same was true for all of us. Everything we had every lived was a twig off the same tree, a finger on the same hand. .Add time, an it became blindingly obvious that the entire tree of life on earth was alive and physically connected, even after three and a half billion years. Not in any metaphysical way but literally, materially, back through all tie toward the root. The same primordial mitochondrial ocean was and is still dividing inside each and every one of us.”
Stamps: Friends Never Fade, Easter Blossoms
Don't make me rave any more about The Urban Vegan than I already do, it's embarrassing. Truly. I refer to her first book, "The Urban Vegan", regularly in my kitchen and whenever I pull it down from the shelf, The Academic starts salivating in mid-air (cue amused look from the cat). From her first book, you can't go past her 5 minute microwave satay sauce, her lemon scented blueberry muffins, her cinnamon-sugar cookies, her rawklava or her curry cashew casserole. Dynise creates both awesome fresh, fast, healthy cafe-style dishes, as well as ornate, decadent high class restaurant-style dishes. They are all a hedonist's delight and written by someone with a the gift of the gab and a knack for impeccably worded food writing. She is helping to add accessible class to vegan (she'd want me to say plant-based) cuisine. The new recipes are organised by "Celebrations" (from traditional Christmas, Birthday, Wedding, and Chinese New Year, to the unexpected - Sick Day, Funeral, Festivus and Slumber Party), but all the recipes will get a workout in your kitchen throughout the year. I can't wait to make her Thai-centric mac and cheese. Click here for her blog.
are unraveled, straightened and smoothed
We will drive out of town to see a doctor before we ever go there again! Let me explain why....
So this is me, stuck in the mud. Looking around and no longer trying to get out because that makes the suction stronger. I will stand here in silence, look around me and listen and just be still. When the time is right I will be able to move.
“It wasn’t you, it was a damn woman.” Mike says with one eyebrow lifted. “There oughta’ be a law against them.” Again I consider lightening the mood by asking if he means a law against women or tampons? I decide to give him a five dollar bill instead. "Nasty things" I say and I can see Mike thinking Does he mean women or tampons?
* 2 ripe bananas (I used two smallish ones)
06. Persuasion (prod. by Stereo Phlyer)
If Charlie Poole or Fiddlin' Doc Roberts would have used recording equipment by today's standards, listen to this album and you know what it would have sounded like. "Barn Dance" by Little Black Train is an album full of authentic, traditional old-time music right from the mountains. In the same category as the Black Twig Pickers, Little Black Train covered a lot of old tunes by familiar rural mountain artists.
Learn To Fly – Foo Fighters
Though human sacrifices were performed in other Mayan cities, Tulum celebrated the God of Life, and so people were spared. Instead, they sacrificed animals such as jaguars, animals that were easily captured… While human sacrifices may seem barbaric, Tulum shows that the Mayans also celebrated life and appreciated it. In reality, it’s not all that different than the modern day willingness to sacrifice lives for the cause of war. It doesn’t show a disrespect or devaluing of life, but an understanding of a greater purpose and belief that the life is being given for a cause. People in Mayan civilizations actually battled it out through games to compete for the opportunity and honor of being sacrificed. I would lose on purpose.
Model: Grayson
maybe I will see dead and war
Is in the tents of the righteous;
I watched Avatar - the last air bender few days ago and liked the movie. While searching for the movie I found that it was from a famous animated serial broadcasted in America and later in India. I downloaded all the 63 episodes of the cartoon and completed watching 13 of them. It is a cartoon serial but funny. I am trying to finish them as it is making me feel anxious as what will happen next.
He sat with her, embraced for a long quite moment. It was peaceful and he felt he had finally broken through her many walls. He really did love her, and if she found her place with his other wives he would ask her to marry him, to be his new wife.
10. Yoakeno Keiji
★Condition★
It includes:
On a Positive Note.
Since I'm in my Blue Willowness mode, I just had to poke in my oil and vinegar jars. See the little black dot on the oil jar? It's a dot of paint and it's not going any where. Believe me, I've scrubbed and scrubbed until I really was Blue in the face but it did not budge!
With 6 games of his suspension going into the playoffs the Los Angeles Lakers are at a small disadvantage.
One of my presents is from Mr Young; when I first open it, I think it’s a hearing aid in a little black case. Not the most tactful of gifts, I’m about to point out, when I realise that it’s a set of headphones.
What are you kids on? - Chappo
But in its submission regarding the CPO, Croydon Council said the arena was vital to regenerating Croydon and changing its image as a 'concrete jungle'. Jon Rouse, chief executive of Croydon Council, said in his evidence: ‘We all want it to happen because we know that it will have a profoundly positive impact on the prospects of this town.
This has already been a long campaign, but many Americans are just now beginning to focus on the choice before the country. In the days ahead, I look forward to spending time with many of you personally. I want to hear what’s on your mind, hear about your concerns, and learn about your families. I want to know what you think we can do to make this country better…and what you expect from your next President.
You can use a couple of forks and shred the beef by poking them into the meat and pulling them apart in opposite directions. However, I prefer to use my hands. That way I can feel my way through the meat and remove any lingering bits of fat.
and this is how i get to spend my days . . .
Joel: My blog: authorjoelarnold.blogspot.com
I know that in my ministry here in San Diego, these groups have been so very important in sharing my struggles, getting ideas, being encouraged to keep moving forward and I believe they will do the same for you.
We did get to meet up with our friend Ashley and her two sweet girls! Deric and Ashley went to high school together but her and I have become friends! We met up for lunch at my favorite Mexican restaurant!!
Really? Can I? NO!!! I CAN NOT! Why?
Recorded at Electric Lady Studios, New York City
it was one of my most favorite memories this holiday season.
Me- Here's your money
We also reject Petitioner’s characterization of the issue such that because the Fifth Amendment prohibits multiple punishments for the same offense, he is actually innocent of the sentence he received for armed robbery.5 Petitioner cannot show actual innocence of the armed robbery sentence without also claiming actual innocence of the armed robbery itself. Petitioner cites various capital cases and habitual offender cases for the proposition that an individual can be actually innocent of a sentence and thereby come within the fundamental miscarriage of justice exception. See, e.g., Sawyer, — U.S. at —-, 112 S.Ct. at 2519 (exception applies to violations that have resulted in the imposition of death sentence upon one who is actually innocent of the death sentence); Smith, 477 U.S. at 537-38, 106 S.Ct. at 2667-68 (same); Mills v. Jordan, 979 F.2d 1273, 1279 (7th Cir.1992) (actual innocence exception applies to habitual offender proceedings, whether or not they involve the possibility of capital punishment). In both of these types of cases, a petitioner can demonstrate actual innocence of the sentence without showing factual innocence of the underlying conviction because the sentence requires a separate showing from the proof required to convict. See, e.g., Sawyer, — U.S. at —-, 112 S.Ct. at 2520 (under Louisiana law, one convicted of capital murder is not eligible for the death penalty unless the jury concludes that one of a list of statutory aggravating circumstances exists); Mills, 979 F.2d at 1279 (under Indiana law, one can be sentenced as an habitual offender if the state proves that he has accumulated two prior unrelated felony convictions). In a capital punishment case, the petitioner is actually innocent of the sentence if he can show factual innocence of the aggravating factors that render one eligible for the death sentence. Sawyer, — U.S. at —-, 112 S.Ct. at 2523. In a habitual offender case, the petitioner is actually innocent of the sentence if he can show he is innocent of the fact–i.e., the prior conviction–necessary to sentence him as an habitual offender. Mills, 979 F.2d at 1279. In any event, actual innocence of the sentence still requires a showing of factual innocence.
Kenny’s eyes flashed briefly, just enough for Danielle to pick up on the jealousy. “Where did Aryc sleep last night?”
You and your business have a S.W.O.T that should be thoroughly looked into. When you know about these areas in your business then you can figure out what’s missing, what’s NOT working right and what IS working right. Then you can make better plans for improvements towards overall success in your business, projects, career and life. You must know and understand that in business you need more than business planning, you need strategic planning and strategic management.
The set turned out cute, but was further proof that my sewing skills have far to go! I have decided to keep my projects on the small side for now, much easier on the ego ;)
One of my biggest loves in life is spending money. Go ahead, ask Mr. T. He’ll be the first to tell you that one of my favorite phrases is…”I want.” To be completely honest, I’m not even embarrassed by this fact. I’m a little bit proud of it because I liken wanting to deserving…as in, “I want” means “I deserve”. Look, I have a lot of self confidence. And conceit. Deal.
It’s official: I’ve been on the road for three weeks. In some ways, it doesn’t seem like it’s been that long.
He said: “It is certainly my hope that, when we hold the next general election, the people will ….. allow me to continue with a process of reform…….”
Shopping organic is a great step towards ensuring that your family eats the healthiest foods possible. The challenge is that although GMOs are an excluded method under the National Organic Program, organic certification does not require GMO testing. Choosing products that are Certified Organic AND Non-GMO Project Verified is the best way to make sure you are getting the safest, healthiest, highest-quality food for your family.
They are the work of Steven Paul Judd, who says he was inspired by paper dolls of the fifties and sixties. Steven says, "I'm not a psychologist so I can't tell you the effects of seeing your people only portrayed in a certain way. I can only speak on my own experience of being a little kid and looking for others on t.v. that I could identify with. Only person I could find was Erik "Ponch" Estrada from "CHiPs". So as a youn'un I pretended to be a motorcycle cop. So my thought is, what if our youth could see there selves not in just a historical context, but as doctors, lawyers, astronauts. So that's when I decided to make these drawings."
The reason is quite simple. The e.mail never existed in the first place. It was a creation of Mangcu's tortured imagination. I bumped into Mangcu at Exclusive Books in Hyde Park on tuesday evening at a time when most men would be home with their wives and children. He was sitting alone at a table in the Seattle Coffee shop. I went up to him and reminded him to check his e.mails. He replied that he isn't opening any e.mails from me.
Their availability will be announced here on the
* very soft bristles
1.King Kong, because he is huge.
In a remarkable book, Physics and Beyond: Encounters and Conversations, Werner Heisenberg (formulator of the famous “Uncertainty Principle” in modern physics) argues that “Science is rooted in conversations. The cooperation of different people may culminate in scientific results of the utmost importance”.
Now it's your turn. You have until 11:59am Eastern Standard Time on Friday June 17th to enter your cards/projects for a chance to win one of the sponsor prizes. As always if the linky tool is missing or is not working feel free to link your entry in the comments section.
“I never wanted to be a thief you know,” I say quietly.
High Society
He looked to be in his early 60′s and not in bad shape, but I wouldn’t think he should be climbing up on rooftops.Nor should he be wearing those shorts.
But before I give you the recipe, I just want to announce that since I now have over 100 followers, and also because November 26th is Small Business Saturday, I'm going to have a Giveaway on that day that will let you have a chance to win a terrific product from one of my favorite small biz! Be sure to come back and enter. :)
This past weekend, I had the opportunity to make the most exciting cake of the summer!
I am at a brink, certainly: the long sandy crest of a dune, where the wind laps at my feet.
For those avid readers out there who compulsively check my blog every day for new updates and insights, my sincerest apologies for not posting for the last week. Y’see, I’ve been a-building a fan-dangled new website for my school using the wonder that is WordPress. Our current website is built using the web-hosting tool of a certain MLE, which takes all its eye-melting ugliness and incomprehensibleness and then foists it upon the unsuspecting Interweb public. As LGfL offers free hosting as part of LGfL2.0, I thought it was at least worth exploring other options for websites. Such as WordPress.
My dad in the hospital after his open heart surgery
Again there was a division among the Jews because of these words.
Dawn Richardson, NVIC Director of Advocacy, who designed the web-based vaccine choice advocacy communications network, developed the Advocacy Portal to make it easier for average citizens to make their voices heard in state legislatures where vaccine exemptions are under attack.
Put in a food chopper the sugar and basil. Mix until all sugar become green.
Failure, a great, great failure, areas wholly lost and nationalism routed, oh they will tell you the vote went up, that compared to this or that and when contrasted with so on and so on but to the common people, the man or women left behind by government, their lives blighted by poverty, crime and lack of resource, it was failure, marked failure. Perhaps for some time nationalism at the ballot will not recover, indeed a vote for nationalism is always considered a wasted vote, “They’ll never get in, so why should I bother”, a common feeling amongst the electorate, democracy has a way of denying a voice to many millions, indeed money wins and parties are chosen not by the people but for the people.
Phuket and Pattaya are the only program offering full-service coordination and the north alabama vacation spots and meat dish Pastitsadaare that are suggested to you to visit other European destinations. Its quite cheap to get hold of a rental agency who will help you and your children to try. There's a sports court which hosts a high number of family or friends, with 7 separate en-suite bedrooms. There are often special rates for military personnel. So remember to do and responsibilities to uphold elsewhere. It is located seventy three kilometres away from work as possible is nice. However, you also have to limit your vacation property! Exchanging a stay in Thailand.
That the vibration in which reverbs from our energies
Reviewers have described Jones’ darkening tone within her lyrics. However, it would be a mistake to view her gravity as one-dimensional. Jones’ previous solo album, The Fall (2009), addressed heavy themes in humorous ways, comparing the follies of passion to “Chasing Pirates.” In the track “Man of the Hour,” Jones concludes that the ideal man is, in fact, a dog. Similarly in much of Little Broken Hearts, she imbues humor into sadistic lyrics by delivering them playfully.
Slow fashion is about respect and integrity. It's about manufacturing quality clothes in limited numbers, within ELLA's economic zone, which is Europe, causing the least damage to the environment. Every item has a traceability and it is made with respect for the person who designs and creates it and the woman who wears it. Sophistication, respect and responsibility are an integral part of ELLA.
1349 **D-IV/27/2000. “Abraham Lincoln and the Pursuit of Happiness.” Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(9), above, pp. 92-103.)
4) Many scholars hold that Jesus was buried in a tomb that was discovered to be empty just a few days later;
Well, till next time, try to stay on your New Year’s Resolution. And while the weather is cold outside, remember some of your favorite rides and share them on www.FewMoreMiles.com. Where were you riding?
Mother stands a feet away from Sweaty and looms over her. Her left hand is on her hip, while she waves her right hand in the air as if trying to make a point. One sees anger blazing in her eyes, the muscles in her neck and face bulging as she shouts every word.
I heaped on copious amounts, then spread it all over, like icing a cake...
The applicant should also submit a statement of the circumstances leading up to and including the removal and any subsequent efforts to recover and/or maintain contact with the child. The applicant may also wish to submit any evidence demonstrating that the United States is the child’s country of habitual residence. If it has been over one year since the child was taken, the applicant should include a statement concerning the reason for the delay before filing the application.
While I’m no master of painting food into language (clearly not a food critic), I am an admirer of the art of written/sensory interpretation and reaction of food. It may sound odd to label something so vague and subliminal as an art form, but I think the ability to manipulate reaction and expectation should be considered as a creative process. There have also been studies in effect of food and perception of flavor via the sound of words, known as synesthesia. It intrigues me that specific wording can be met with an associated sensory perception whether that is a component of our nervous system or merely a Pavlovian reaction. In other words, is “bacon”, “butter” and “sausage” really as sexy as it sounds? Is it even better if I call it “sexy bacon”?
A hand-drawn illustration accompanying the piece depicts Obama wearing a jacket and tie complete with a flag pin and “Obama” name badge, and sporting a mustache in the style of Nazi dictator Adolf Hitler.
S is for song! That's what my card is all about and one of my favorite things about Christmas is the beautiful music and Christmas carols. I used the Winter Wonderland cartridge to cut that cute shaped layer that my image is stamped on using the tag feature. How have I not used that feature before??
I can't say I figured out what exactly the Parisian pull was, or why I needed to go back so desperately or even what my next step is after coming home (reluctantly). I'm sure with time it will all sink in and unravel and get clearer. For now, I am still reveling in having escaped my normal life and flown from my self-imposed cage, if only for a while.
But on days when half the team is missing through injury, and we’re away against a top half Premier League club that can remain composed in the face of pressure…I’m not sure my heart’s ready for that kind of action.
"No, that still won't work. Try again."
The liberal, pragmatic me, went to lengths to drive home what I’ve always known to be true. That people are just people. Regardless of race or creed. But the Muslim in me screamed about how NO MUSLIM BOY WOULD EVER defile his ‘sister’ thus. How NO MUSLIM BOY who understands the value of a mother or sister WOULD EVER rape a fellow muslimah. Gang rape belonged in the realm of far removed from reality fiction.
32. Rosie - The McDonald Family
The weaknesses, though, are considerable. First, if your reader is not already familiar with the brand/object, it is quite a bit more frustrating for them than just saying "car." For example, I have no idea what an '85 Chrysler LeBaron looks like, so rather than brining me closer to the object, this proxy detailing actually creates more distance than just "car" would, as I am now aware that there is a gap in the information intended and the information received.
Fairie Festival is more like performing ... and serious performing at that. There's a deep spirit there that must be taken seriously.
Ty-oh, oh-oh
Hanno and I will be at the Cooroy Butter Factory tonight for the Permaculture Noosa gathering and tomorrow at Dymocks in Brisbane - the details are here. We hope to see you if you're close by.
'I know people will say that their son or daughter wouldn't do anything so stupid, but really I don't think parents have any idea what goes on at university and what pressures their children will come under to do stupid things,' says Melissa, who shares a flat with friends in South London.
TSUNAMI MAY HAVE BEEN DESTRUCTIVE ALONG COASTLINES OF THE REGION
How many of you combine exercise with social time?
The Tsunami and the Cherry Blossom
If you are looking for a test kit to make sure your teen is drug free, call your neighborhood Health Mart pharmacy.
4. No matter how shitty you feel the next morning, NEVER admit defeat unless you puke.
And I love my new camera! There could be better ones, but this one works for me.
I wish I had the recipe. Until then, I'll just keep buying it on days when I'm feeling down. Do you have a favorite cake that you always eat to feel better? (I have plenty, this is just the cheapest of all, lol). Let me know!
Today I woke up early because I had things to worry about. Instead, rain broke open the sky and I opened my sliding glass door to listen to it. I saw three primitive wise men walking up my road, nodding to me as they passed. I took it all in like water, and watched as this day’s light, gently and under cloud cover, showed me as much as I could bear to see.
“Small world. Small wretched, pathetic, ghetto, dignity and self respect stealing fast food restaurant in the ghetto world.”
The nightmares that we are seeing unfold in Spain and Greece right now are just a preview of what is coming to most of the rest of the world.
Nothing compares to the flavor of food that is grown in healthy soil, without pesticides, and allowed to grow until just the right time for harvest. Square foot gardening uses only 20% of the land space of a conventional garden and saves both water and time. There is no tilling of the soil so anybody can do it. Join JoAnn as she explains the concept of this successful technique.
What does all of this mean then? That we can sit under the fallacies of fools like Benny Hinn, Joel Osteen, and Kenneth Copeland and still learn something? Surely not. Paul wrote two epistles to Timothy where in first Timothy, chapters 1, 4 and, 6, AVOIDING false teaching is a major theme as well as all of second Timothy.
Rant time, the second! (I really should be doing homework right now, but whatevs)
(makes about 7 – 4″ diameter pancakes)
January 24, 2011
Kit points out that Muffy has been at college, not in a hospital, for the last 3-4 years. Rob then mentions that Muffy mentioned a spare key for the boat, but it's back in the mansion. They sneak back to the house, crouching and trying to be a silent as possible. They find a basement window that's open, and get back in that way.
Get a load of these teachers:
The key reason why many Singaporeans are so vehemently against the ruling party’s immigration policies is because they feel they are not getting a fair deal as citizens from the elected government of the day.
Christian Endeavor Growth From 1881 to 1902—the date of Dr. Bob’s graduation from college at Dartmouth.
“Hey ya bum ya, you fuckin bum”
Jennifer Lyell, Moody Publishers
It’s odd they didn’t mention this ‘grace’ preachers book, “Honor’s Reward: How To Attract God’s Favor And Blessing” (2007). The book title says it all; how can you attract (earn) the favor (grace) of God on your life? It’s odd he says we need men and women who “speak the word of his grace” but promotes the exact opposite in his mentioned book.
Not so long ago, the average mid-twentysomething had achieved most of adulthood’s milestones—high school degree, financial independence, marriage, and children. These days, he lingers—happily—in a new hybrid state of semi-hormonal adolescence and responsible self-reliance. Decades in unfolding, this limbo may not seem like news to many, but in fact it is to the early twenty-first century what adolescence was to the early twentieth: a momentous sociological development of profound economic and cultural import. Some call this new period “emerging adulthood,” others “extended adolescence”; David Brooks recently took a stab with the “Odyssey Years,” a “decade of wandering.”...Nostalgia posing as thought.
Truest Intentions is a phrase that I've been throwing around in my mind lately as I watch my children grow and thrive. I watch the kids of my friends and I watch one friend struggle with the negative intentions of her family. Some of her extended family think she is doing the wrong thing keeping her kids at home. Both have refused to go to school.
Apply fresh lemon juice to the pimple, before you go to bed. Simply cut a lemon and squeeze the juice on the pimple. But make sure that your face is washed clean before you spread the juice on the pimple or pimples with your finger tips.
When Choc chips are melted add:
But we did.
Los Angeles gets such a hard rap about so many things, but integrating with coyotes is one thing I think it does pretty well (as long as you keep a tight hold of your pets). I love living among coyotes and hearing them howl. I love that among all this urban grit wildlife still thrives. Sometimes I fantasize about living on a big horse ranch in Montana, or somewhere like that. And for a few minutes when I hear those coyotes howl and see them galloping by within an arm's reach I feel like I'm connected to nature in the same way I would be on a big ranch. And I've still got Trader Joe's and a fro-yo spot a stone's throw away.
Through a mildly convoluted series of events, she’s forced to leave L.A. and go to New York to bail him out of jail for prostitution. Not only does she not tell him upfront that she’s his father, but she also fails to tell him that she’s a transsexual. It’s a credit to Huffman’s performance that it doesn’t occur to Toby that something’s a little “off” about her and the viewer doesn’t question it either. (Of course, maybe that’s the genius of casting a woman in the role in the first place.) It's also noteworthy that Toby is presented as the far more troubled of the two - in the "fucked up" department, Bree's pretty normal next to her son.
And this reminded me of a story....
So if this sounds like something that happens to you and you've not found anything that works then - and I know this is going to sound weird - try using Zinc and Castor Oil cream from Boots (or in fact I've just found it cheaply here - although I haven't tried this particular one). It's in the nappy rash section and no using Sudocrem is not going to be the same. This stuff really works if you apply it whenever you remember, for a couple of days.
2) having a PA whilst walking round on guided tour of cultural hotspots, making a tit of myself and feeling embarrassed and pathetic
I love keeping track of the funny things the kids say. We have gotten so many laughs over the years from looking back and reading the "funny things" posts. Here's a few I wanted to remember...
8pm, thursday 21 June 2012
On the front of the card you'll see a photo of a "piper", which is a particular pest on Skye and other Highland & Island locations. I don't know if you had many problems with them during your stay on Lewis.
Inverted pyramids to form inverted pyramids
We are told again and again by 'experts' and 'talking heads' that Islam is the religion of peace and that the vast majority of Muslims just want to live in peace. Although this unqualified assertion may be true, it is entirely irrelevant. It is meaningless fluff, meant to make us feel better, and meant to somehow diminish the spectre of fanatics rampaging across the globe in the name of Islam.
So there are my thoughts for you. And here's my pink ombre hair.
* Dissolve agar powder in water. Add sugar and bring to boil using medium heat, stirring occasionally.
This card would be great to use for upcoming Graduations. You could recreate this card using the school colors and you would be set.
As the hunt for the children intensifies, so does Lexi's need to know—about the witch that just might be more than a bedtime story, about the wind that seems to speak through the walls at night, and about the history of this nameless
Hey, it’s that time again: If you’ve enjoyed the comic over the last two years and you’d like to support my classroom, please click over to our DonorsChoose page and throw a few shekels our way. DC has an amazing “Almost Home” grant going on right now, whereby all of our projects are within $100 dollars of being funded! That’s a lot of new books for our classroom’s lending library! Please give what you can.
Oh, and by the way, the chickens did make it through their first night, leaving an astounding quantity of chicken poop in their wake. And the housemates finished their room-painting sometime after I was sound asleep (passed out) last night… they have great taste in colors.
Also - Bias Binding from stash and used Nesties and Cuttlebug to die cut the image and mat.
Other than a numerical round-up, in Wednesday's Month in Numbers post, this is the final installment of A Month of Sunrays and I wanted to bow out with something completely bright and happy-making.
Somebody told me every decision is right
It’s all about tradition. Concepts such as marriage and the like are almost as old as society and civilised living itself. To modernise them after they’ve been the same (or at least similar) for so long would be to break with years, decades, centuries of tradition.
painting on conditioner
Had a faaaaaaaab night tonight. Awesome! Got taken to dinner and I had a really good time, so did Mal by the way he was smiling with every female in the building (such a flirt)!
It feels like wearing your favourite jacket when you're home alone
Rosamund Pike as Kate Summer, she is a psychologist which is study people face & expression, which is can detect the person is telling truth or lie. Johnny English is flirting with her in this movie, and very funny scene when she is trying to help Johnny English search some memory.
“I think this winter, as whooping cough upticks, measles continues to be under-vaccinated, we’re going to increasingly see pockets of communicable infections that a few decades ago we thought, frankly, we had eradicated from the United States. These illnesses should not be seen in the United States with the vaccinations that we have at hand,”says Snyderman.
Black Marker
The like-minded insanity?
The acquisition arrives at a critical time for Sony, as the company has weathered disappointing sales and a leadership overhaul. The Japanese company is struggling to stay afloat in a competitive market, and the deal confers vital advantages, like cross-licensing and integration opportunities.
It is necessary to stipulate the rights to licensor improvements in the grant and to allow for their use as well. A specific provision providing for access to all improvements effected by the licensor during the period of the agreement and the right to their use is desirable from the licensee’s viewpoint. Improvements are usually subject to the same secrecy obligations imposed for the know-how and confidential information disclosed during the agreement. Improvements made by the licensee to be granted back to the licensor require a separate clause to specify how they are to be handled (see discussion on grant-back of improvements below).
Jessica George, Senior Publisher Relations Manager
Somewhat questionably named Living Headstones, the scannable tombstones link visitors to online content about the grave’s owner, such as their obituary, family history, photos and even links to their Facebook and Twitter pages. The result is a wonderfully interactive way of preserving a loved one’s memory.
I never have the opportunity to take long showers. That's simply a luxury. As I fumble with the shampoo and soap and let the scalding hot water pour over my sinuses, I think about how I am finally in a place in my life that I actually can shower. Those who are parents with babies or small toddlers can relate.
so I am driving like a snail. and we have a plan for if it happens. well half a plan. the main issue are these tow truck rats. this teacher ended up having to pay each tow guy RM100 to leave her alone and move their trucks. they had actually block her car off from her insurance tower. did I mention they got aggressive with her?
Two movies about Carthaginian conqueror Hannibal Barca are in production at the moment, one starring Denzel Washington and the other, Vin Diesel. Well, historically he came from Tunisia, right? That's in Africa, right? One can envision the producers scrabbling through the drawers to find a world map and then giving up.
Four days after a dozen journalists were assaulted and photo equipment damaged, police public relations at Bukit Aman invited — or pleaded with or cajoled or harassed — editors to meet the Inspector-General of Police this morning for what was described as a “breakfast meeting”.
Stroke can have devastating and long-lasting impacts on the lives of patients and their relatives. In this article, the first in the Wellcome Trust’s Focus on stroke, Nic Fleming talks to leaders in the field to hear how this condition has finally begun to be recognised as the medical emergency it is.
Auditions will begin in January to find a new singing or acting talent to sign a agreement with one of Korea's leading entertainment agencies, SM Entertainment said yesterday.
I’ve been practicing yoga since 4th grade, when I was 9-years-old and accidentally stumbled upon a show called “Yoga for Health” in the 1970s, staring Richard Hittleman (RIP). Since then I was hooked and made yoga a part of my exercise routine.
CISPA is more about destroying personal freedom than online security. Post-9/11, it eroded steadily en route to destroying it altogether. CISPA is another nail in its coffin. Its burial plot awaits.
However, what cannot be denied is that in an effort to get the books out in the market, the quality of the presentation, printing style, binding has not been upto the mark.
This all came to a screeching halt with one income. In order to stay at home, I had to take over many of the things that we had paid others to do when we lacked the resource of time.
the bracelets his father made to the awing tourists.
2055.E-VI/25/1997. “Secrets and Lies.” (on the conduct of officers in the military). Chicago Sun-Times, p. 38.
Lurks behind what? The drapes? Schizophrenia is a serious mental illness and other than the one line in the first paragraph, you've given us no hint that this is part of the novel.
(Built around a hole in the ground, they lined the bottom with hardware cloth, and the walls are cinder-block. This structure is a sound way of keep rodents from burrowing into the compost container. The lid, on hinges, is made using insulation to keep the temp controlled inside.)
Indeed any failure to appreciate or wholeheartedly welcome and enjoy any culture other than your own can result in accusations of racism, whereas expressing an affection and appreciation of your own culture too enthusiastically can render you, at the very least, liable for suspicion of racism.
"We acknowledge that the juxtaposition, on the one hand, of use of a mark on the Internet, and on the other hand, the seeking of a geographically restricted registration is troubling. Indeed, in the age of the Internet, concurrent use registrations premised on geographically distinct uses appear to be a legal fiction as the Internet is accessible not only nationwide but world-wide."
Oliver stopped and stared at her. "Leonard is marrying a dog?"
Its not like I really needed anything, after a fairly present heavy Christmas but like a moth to a flame, I felt drawn to the Soldes in the hope of a "deal". It takes a more disciplined person then I to resist the urge to score a bargain.
I know that my literary friends will say that I sold out (the film rights to Pure sold before the novel did). But I don't know what that means when, day after day, I labored over this work, not knowing if 431 pages later, anything would come of it. All I know is that it felt good. It felt like a liberation. And now that I've found a way through the gates, I invite literary writers to come for visit. I've got a torch. I know a few of the cobbled streets. Come and see for yourself what's here.
Bersih accused the Election Commission (EC) today of failing to investigate 3.1 million voters whose identity card (IC) addresses differ from that in the electoral roll despite having the information since 2002.
- July 1967 sings Hare Krishna Mantra for first time on holiday in Greece
Paciorek then decide to retired after another injury to his shoulder.
FIC C
Hair: Kumi- Pony Tail- Dark Red Flame- Wasabi Pills (New)
Alongside the artifacts selected by Grayson Perry from the galleries and storerooms of the museum, there are his new artworks created to comment on themes: shrines, pilgrimage, relics, gender, craftsmanship, the patina of age . . .
Bernstein gives a thorough review of craft brewing as well as just good information about beer. This book will make you thirsty. The lay out of this book is well done and full of interesting tidbits about the beer industry. Bernstein includes lots of lists that share where to find good beer. The text also has information about the art of beer making. It will encourage you to expand your beer habits, whether you are a beer drinker, a home brewer, or some combination there of. This is a great resource book but it is also entertaining. This book is well written and informative.
Superintendent Wes Smith is out of town and would not comment directly on the lawsuit. The school district did say it has not officially received notification of the lawsuit.
That one was my favorite when I was a teenager. The best character of all, the most exciting with a great lust for life and experience, with so much passion. Probably the most passionate book of all. You could fall in love with the main character from the pages of the book without seeing him. Lermontov is my fovorite Russian poet.
Some tests have essay parts, and one teacher said that she marked me low because she couldn’t understand my handwriting. Again, I tried to write more neatly, but when I did this, I got lower marks. Why? If I try to make my handwriting neat, I’d have to write slowly. Slowing down my scribbles makes me forget the ideas that have popped into my head. If I forget these ideas, all I have left are the mediocre ones, and they are the ones that get inked on the page and graded by the teacher. I had to make a decision. I began to weigh the costs of my bad handwriting verses the benefits of jotting down interesting ideas. I realized that I’d rather run the risk of not being understood for the possibility of saying something brilliant.
U.S. Defense Secretary Leon Panetta warned North Korea not to engage in any further provocation.
# 2 – There’s nothing like Nature to make the evolutionary process a little easier by providing us with beauty….sometimes in small, intricate packages known as insects …
Washington, D.C.—On Friday, the American Immigration Council challenged a decision by the Board of Immigration Appeals (BIA) ruling that immigrants who are arrested without a warrant do not need to receive certain Miranda-like warnings before being interrogated.
Dr. Andrew Weil, a noted physician, self-healing expert, and author of Natural Health, Natural Medicine, posits that reports of positive results experienced by users have more to do with placebo effects than with the actual healing properties of urine.
Her eyes rolled back and she began lapsing in and out of consciousness.
5. Good Design is Unobtrusive
This is the fifth in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Media Operating Manual for Enterprises. The book (itself part of a series for different audiences), is available in paper form at http://bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
"I like the word "indolence." It makes my laziness seem classy."
Let others do the heaving and shoving
1. Make money at
IS LASER SMOKING STOP THERAPY FOR YOU?
The Sadness quit crying. She looked her new companion straight in the eyes. "But...but who are you?"
For Rasam
Since I’ve been yammering away about royalty statements all week, let’s dig in to this topic. I’ll have to start off a little light because it’s just now occurring to me that this might make a couple of interesting posts and I’m typing this from home (rather than from work where I would actually be looking at a royalty statement).
“Launching the fragrance on the platform of HSN gave Mary the opportunity to tell her story to millions of people at once,” Steve Stoute, chairman & Lead Investor of Carol’s Daughter, said in a canned statement. “She’s an artist that connects with her fans on a visceral level – it was imperative for her to connect directly with them. She doesn’t sell goods, she sells her understanding and love for women.”
This week in the Top 25 Countdown, a new “Walt-era” title enters in a big way, a title dropped from the countdown last week comes back, and the top spot changes hands again. Presenting each week: the 25 unreleased Disney titles YOU the members want to see released on DVD the most.
The world Maria creates in Poison Study is magic, simple and beautiful. Ixia was reigned by an unjust king when Commander Ambrose took the power from him to right things. Ixia is divided in different Military Districts (MD, for short) and ruled according to the Code. The same Code that dictates that Yelena must me executed for murdering her adoptive father's son. She's an orphan, but she's not an assassin; General Brazell and Reyad, his son, brutally abused her and a lot of other orphaned children that they had taken "under their care". Yelena did what she did fully conscious of her acts. She just wanted to spare the other children that would surely come after her. She's set to prison to wait to be executed. Except, luck seems to be on her side and she's offered the position to be the Commander's food taster.
These websites are intended to help inform you about SAP solutions, Business Intelligence, Cloud Computing and ERP solutions:
They're living every girls dream: getting spray tanned and wearing padded bras.
only three quarters fell in the well,
The shocking scenes from Japan are now in the past. There are more news coming out from other parts of the world such as crisis in Libya, movement in Syria and Yemen and battle in Côte d’Ivoire. Just like any other events, people started to talk less about the earthquake in Japan. However, the people in the disaster zone continue to battle with the challenges they face everyday and survive the difficult time.
But she is also intensely working class and is vividly depicted. She is, in other words, other than being a horrible person exactly what one wants when one says that the working class is underrepresented on television. She is well-acted with a wealth of carefully chosen traits that bring authenticity to the role. Her storylines frequently have her struggle with money troubles and the miseries and degradations that come with being in the working poor.
Nor the bayonet stab O friend.
1. Yelp is a social community, and reviews are the commonality among the users. Many people see Yelp as a review site, which it is, but it also a community of people who happen to write reviews. Yelp uses have also been called anonymous. This may be true for the lurkers or the mostly inactive users on Yelp, but most users are NOT anonymous. In the age of social media, most of the users are identifiable. Users are pretty easily identified by the places they review, their photos, or other profile information. Even users with the most generic profiles have been identified by the community. This business was sniffed out by the community, and well, it didn't go over so well. To say that users are completely anonymous is a misunderstanding. Additionally, Yelp Elite members are required to use their real names and real photos.
On the way home I asked him to walk me through what happened not leaving out a single detail -- he painstakingly described everything from the part about the bus being late, and that the playground duty aid telling them it was okay to go play on the playground, and she would blow her whistle when it was time to line up, to the little boy who fell and hurt his knee, to the fact that my son saw his bus pull up and that he chose to continue to play and then turned around and watched his bus leave the drive way and turn left realizing he was the only one on the playground.
“Until the next commercial, then bed.”
Dawkins' does write some appalling rubbish very early on. Included in his list of things that only occurred because of religion he mentions the Troubles in NI/Ireland, well I would tend to the argument that the IRA (and other) campaigns were largely carried out because the IRA saw themselves as freedom fighters seeking to oust an invading army from their homeland and that as such religion played a very minor role. He also claims that the Gunpowder Plot could not have happened without religion, yet there have been numerous coups and assassinations (including the murder of Prime Minister Spencer Perceval) which have as their prime motivators politics, power, revenge or money.
Stamp: Bildmålarna- Waiting for Santa
Needless to say thems’ fightin’ words. So English apparently circulated a letter in his own defense, and tried to get his colleagues in the cooking world to sign it. He didn’t have much luck.
I am just praying everything goes well next week for Kaitlyn's surgery, that J & H have a good week and that my mom doesn't have to many issues while I am gone. Since she's been here, I've been to visit just about every day for the last 7 months or so, this is the 1st time she will not have someone come visit for so long, so I am worried. I know my phone will ring like crazy, because she will forget that I am not here to come see her. I really don't need that extra stress, but I don't see a way to avoid it.
Something shook the trees again, causing goosebumps to stand out on Mellie’s arms. Alarmed, she checked the skyline. The sun was close to setting. She hoped that the police weren’t out looking for her.
So anyway, I'll update whenever I get my shit together on something new. I'm just feeling totally uninspired right now, which might have something to do with working full time or it might just be a normal dip in the ol' creativity, whatever. IT'S BEEN A GOOD RUN, BREAD AND HONEY. Shit's about to get real, tho. :P
The sides -
Today I went specifically for a sofa table that I’ve had my eye on for some time now. It’s actually a table used for working, reading and eating in bed which means it’s slightly longer and taller than the average sofa table – and it’s on casters which in a small space is ideal for versatility.
Music can also stir memories, good or bad, and transport you back in time.
When we first started unschooling, I would get on the (now defunct) unschooling.com message boards and ask at least one question just about every day. These quickly became "Dragonfly's Question of the Day," and the women and men who answered me showed considerable patience and creativity in their replies.
There two large concrete eggs, maybe seven feet high, at the side of the allegedly non-existent cellar door hut. What the…
I had a couple missions when coming to Japan. One was to eat everything I could find, the other was to try as many Japanese whiskeys as I could get my hands on. So in typical Dre fashion I made friends with a bartender. He knew all the places to go and insured that I wasn’t leaving Japan before I tried all the whiskey Japan had to offer. Not sure whether you know this or not, but I love whiskey. I’m mostly a bourbon drinker but I’ve been known to not discriminate with my whiskeys. I’d been looking forward to trying these gems for awhile since Japanese whiskey is hard to find in Canada. I was not disappointed. I tried whiskeys from all over the country ranging from 12 to 25 years old. There wasn’t one I didn’t like. I brought back two different 15 year olds and I can’t wait to share them with my other whiskey loving friends. Mission accomplished.
too full,
I now need to plan for 3 and add "toddler school" to my daily plan, complete with play dough, puzzles, drawing, collage, water paint and anything else that comes to my mind.
6. Ride out the bad. Do whatever you have to do to get through those bad times without compromising your integrity and worth as a person.
The National Gallery in London has a beautiful collection of Van Gogh paintings and I make it a point to visit them whenever I wander into Trafalgar Square. The first time I saw “Sunflowers” in person, I literally forgot how to breathe. I’d seen postcards and images in books, but nothing compares to personally witnessing the broad brushstrokes that define his unique style. The paint jumps up from the canvas and gives even the most ordinary objects incredible flare. I’ve spent hours staring at his paintings as they evoke powerful emotions and inspire fascinating trains of thought.
During lunch play Lee and his friend Freddie stayed inside and as they listened to the recording they discussed what they should draw. It was fabulously to sit back and watch two children who often find the writing process difficult work together to plan how they would present Lee’s story.
4. for the top crust of the pie, i used a cookie cutter and cut out shapes to cover the pie.
Those who look upon Dataran Merdeka as a symbol of freedom will view the exclusion from Dataran Merdeka as freedom denied. The promise by the government to respect democracy and human rights, and implement reforms, was tested yesterday.
“The Christian Endeavor Society may also fairly claim from the beginning to have put into practical operation the psychologist’s dictum already quoted, ‘No impression without expression.’ Long before psychology was studied except by the learned few, long before it had become a fad in certain quarters, the Society attempted to put into practice its latest philosophy, and recognized the vital importance of religious activity to supplement and round out religious instruction.
So, I visited this site to personally read and study Balisacan’s previous research and published papers. I wasn’t surprised by what I discovered. Based on his published works, Balisacan is a hardcore statist who believes in government planning of the economy, income distribution, redistribution of wealth, and population control or management.
♥ Engage in physical activity
LaMichael James is leaving the Ducks for the bucks. The Oregon all-purpose running back is skipping his senior season for the NFL draft.
With most of Hollywood being hardcore liberals, conservative actor/comedian Jim Labriola is a breath of fresh air.
Germany, 1969.
a dire imposition on your life actually
WTF Award: The drinking fountain at O'Fallon's booth spouting out Gold for people to drink. The germaphobe inside me was horrified.
Mitt Romney never killed a hobo did he?
Yea, I’m pumped up.
# Name, Team – SCR (Shot%/TS%/TO%)
Please remember that tomorrow is picture day. Put your brightest smiles on and your best outfit.
Thank you for visiting my little blog and leaving such beautiful comments! I am really amazed at this whole Giveaway event and already have a great idea in the works for the next Giveaway Day!!
It’s clear that everyone’s hard work paid off on this one because now we can all say we’ve contributed to a professional (looking) blog. Hats off to the design team for that; it looks awesome. We’ve even got over 1500 followers! (Although I think Amy somehow pimped the system on that one. Whatever, numbers don’t lie). Overall, I’m counting this project as a success. Even if nobody’s liked my post yet (dicks).
Dear Dr. Laura
Creative Ciaos Game: (you can name it what ever you like)
December’s Cabinet Office prospectus, Unlocking Growth in Cities, stated that cities wanting significant new powers and funding would “need to demonstrate strong, visible and accountable leadership and effective decision-making structures” –universally interpreted as having an elected mayor.
Experience all these miracles and know diversity of life and spirit.
So you may wonder where I have been the last 2 months and the answer is very Easy. First we were at DISNEY WORLD for 10 days then we came home and the morning after we got home I woke up sick, and was pretty sick for about 3 1/2 weeks, while Marvin was gone about 18 hours a day in Wheat Harvest.
all goes a lot deeper than that.
Oh, they need a hen too....and if one can't be borrowed or made from papier mâché it has been suggested that I could find a compliant bird with thespian tendencies from my hen pen. Strewth! I think not. An afternoon covering a wire frame with paste and paper would be infinitely preferable. Non?
A. Barack Obama
Cali, Colombia
He likes to watch the Good Night Show on Sprout TV in the evenings.
Compare those amounts to figures from globalissues.org, showing that basic education for everyone worldwide would cost $6 billion. Water and sanitation, $9 billion. Reproductive health care for all women, $12 billion. Basic health and nutrition care, $13 billion.
Word Per Minute continue their monthly showcase of writing in typical bright and breezy fashion, but it has a much more experimental air than WPM2, which I attended in June. First up is Skye Loneragan. She performs the first ten minutes of her new solo show, Plucked of Purpose – The adventures of PB. Perhaps because we’re only seeing the briefest snapshot of the whole performance, it’s difficult to grasp the context of what’s going on, and just as it’s beginning to tip into something with a little more verve and wit, it has to end.
Consultants: Fr. Ian G. Pac-Urar, Fr. Timothy Baclig, Fr. Ion Gherman, Dr. Stephen Muse
Quick question peeps? When you walk are you not performing a plank? And when you perform a One Arm Press? Hmm…Why is it then when you do a plank it looks like hell? Do you walk funny…So on that note how about a nice Plank Medley?
Lake Superior is a character unto itself that demands respect. The water is cold, heartless and holds its secrets and spirits deep within. The sky above moves and dances like the spirits of the northern lights. The imagery is beautiful and draws the reader in, like the lake draws people to it shores.
I commit myself in finding ways how I can release myself from the believe that I need my mind to exist and function in my reality where I prove to myself slowly but surely that breath is the only thing I need to be here
Physical advantage – I hit the gym and had a terrific workout before most people knew morning had arrived. I had time to drink anti-oxidant packed coffee and eat eggs jammed with protein. It feels great to be healthy.
Not only do I think being outspoken is incredibly important, it also just feels so GOOD to share something I'm so passionate about, to be a part of a movement I think is so important!
I've gathered up a few Irish tidbits for your enjoyment. The website I took them from--Ireland Fun Facts--calls them facts. Not accusing anyone, of course, but the Irish have been known to embellish once in awhile, especially when telling a story. And I'm simply too lazy to verify. (Now there's the real truth of the matter!)
I hope you enjoy our video!
Maritime industries began to relocate either downriver or to other ports in Britain.
Your reason and your passion are the rudder and the sails of your seafaring soul. If either your sails or your rudder be broken, you can but toss and drift, or else be held at a standstill in mid-seas.
Next, I told Emily that she could make letters too. She wanted to try an E for the first letter of her name. Then she wiped it away I had her to try another letter. We took turns picking letters, writing them and then making the sound. Since the letters in the paint are so easy to wipe away if she made a mistake she could easily try again. As Emily got older she now likes to try to write the different words that she knows too.
I was talking to one of my friends about the prophet, priest, king concept, and I told them, “I know stuff about my life NOBODY else can tell me, and I couldn’t think of a really good quality example at the time. This morning I was telling Daughter #1 about how my worring over Saint doesn’t mean that I love him more than the kids, it means that I am for some reason less certain of his time with us. (I think it is because usually when I cherish something this much, things–most notably my 1900′s steamer trunk, something happens in my heart eventually, so that I seperate myself from it because it is a thing, and because Wubbies death was accidental and he was taken from me early.) I knew when I was 17 that I was going to have a boy dog, who stood exactly as tall as Saint, ( All of my married life I would tell MOH, “The perfect dog for us has a head just high enough that I can scratch him and I don’t have to slouch or bend down. Saint’s head is the perfect height on my body for that.) who had a long furry coat. I did not know that he would be a border collie, all I knew was that I would be madly in love with him, and that he would be a great joy to my life.
When you go into Craft Room, you will find Cricut Craft Room Basics in Craft Room Exclusives or My Cartridges. When it is on your overlay you will see the Onesie in the lower right corner, if you click shift, you will get the shadow for the onesie. To make your card you will want to use the shadow for the card base using a heavier card stock. Then you can cut the smaller onesie for the front of your card.
(This photo by Gary Ashe shows Alan O'Brien giving me a piece of his mind. He got a good bit closer to me than he did to Pat Kenny. ⓒ Irish Daily Star)
The short apology reads:
Paper: glossy card stock
Amy goes on her residential tomorrow. She's so excited to be sharing a room with three of her friends. "We can talk about girlie things," she said, a huge smile etched on her face.
When you start to slide, SLIDE. He who changes his mind may have to change a good leg for a bad one.
Yup – gotta focus on things that benefit people who already have jobs that already have perks.
I've really been loving J. Crew jewelry lately. I was able to grab a few jewelry pieces I've been eyeing during a recent trip to San Francisco. I LOVE the Bauble Cascade Necklace; here is an IRL picture:
For example, if a woman with blonde hair wears black shoes with her dress, the eye will fixate on the dark shoes and get stuck there. However, when her shoes go with her hair coloring there is less visual chaos and the eye is content with the color unity. This makes the outfit pleasing to the eye!
WHAT: “The Art of the Dress” exhibition and sale.
What makes Cool World such a flat tire on the Yugo of Life? I'll be getting to that in detail but first off, let me explain why this movie deserved such high hopes to begin with. The film was directed by no less a visionary than Ralph Bakshi. Yes, he's the man who gave us such animated films as Heavy Traffic, Fritz The Cat and Coonskin, all of which took great strides in being unapologetic, un-PC, incredibly inciting in terms of race and sex and ferociously memorable. He also made amazing later works like 1977's Wizards, 1978's The Lord Of The Rings and 1981's American Pop.
JNG: The most challenging aspect for me, has really been a problem that isn't really a problem -- saying no! I'm really fortunate that my work has been in enough demand, but it's been tough learning the art of delegation when you want to control every little thing! Having a retail background makes you always want to say yes to everyone all the time! But like I said, it's a good problem. I'd rather work 24/7 than have no work at all.
Perhaps it depends on mood, or even expectations. I was hoping for an eXistenZ, but got a Species instead, a Fly without significant evolution. Splice is truly a Frankensteinian affair made of scraps from superior, er, donors.
Weather-day or in night
I was racking my brain as to how to get around this perplexing problem and then I'm Not Emily Brown came to my rescue and reminded me of how useful and warm legwarmers can be, not to mention a stylish solution against the cold. So I dug out an old black pair from my ballet days (just seen above my boots in the photo above) and the freezing gap was closed!
In fact, many of my entries here
So we ask you, “Is slavery legal in America?” If you realize that the definition for slavery is: When some one else takes your money for your labor for their benefit against your will, is that not slavery?
There’s something mesmerizing about the glow from a Christmas tree. It calms me, makes me pause and give thanks, and makes me feel all gooey inside. :)
The mind wanders. And I remember how April is simply one month nestled against the broader reaches of eleven other months in a big year, but she roared with challenges. Difficult positions arose, taught by teachers past and present.
Writing has been such a big part of my life. I don't know why I have hit this spot where I'm finding it so hard to blog these days. I have so much going on, and so much to say... but nothing seems to come out right. I know I will come out of this, just like I have before.
My body talked. I listened.
I peeked at the brownies after about 28 minutes, to see how they looked and was horrified to see white bubbles of peppermint patties oozing up out of the crust. (At this point I had not read the P&Q). I figured it was too late to do anything about it, and left the pan in the oven for another few minutes till they were done.
The last time we were home, this place let us down, it let us down a lot. In short, it was awful. But, we’d heard good things about it since we got home, and decided that we’d give it another shot – for old times sake.
Russ: “I have never read, er, ‘Karnt’.”
Stage: "Linné"-stage
Media: Promarkers and Flexmarkers on main image; sentiments stamped with distress ink;
Anyone see anything good or recommend anything from the old list?
1 balance
When this occurs, because I know nothing whatever at first, I carry on as though nothing has happened.
Today, on the 8th of May, my Aunt and Uncle celebrate their birthdays.
Miyauchi F, Nanjo K, Otsuka K. Effects of night shift on plasma concentrations of melatonin, LH, FSH, prolactin and menstrual irregularity. Sangyo Igaku Jpn J Ind Health 1992; 34: 545-550.
They can grow until they are 30 meters high, their leaves can be 3 meters long and have about 80 leaflets on each side of the central rachis.
Next in line are two brand new reds that I got even before they were named. They started out as 11.10.9 and 11.10.9s. Now they are known as Crimson and Ruby Slippers respectively. Both are limited run colors, and Crimson is already available, while Ruby Slippers will come out sometime in April, according to CiM's website.
reply to your message in the same comment section.
Reading a non topic book was helpful too. It took me to another world far away from the one I was in for a brief time.
Louisiana
We talked for a little bit about the website he was creating for his History Fest extravaganza, and then I asked the question that had been nagging me for a long while: "So, have you been playing your harp much?" There was a long, guilty silence. "Ummm..." Jack began. I know he's been busy. I know he's making life wonderful for countless people with all his entertaining doings (case in point: he's taking a group of church youth group students to a reservation in South Dakota this weekend to put on a History Fest entertaining / learning opportunity for the children there).
Trinity United Methodist Church
Gross?
This whole “coming home” and “staying” home after 3 years of adventure has been tough.
-side salad
6.Why You Going Away
Dates: Jul 2-Aug 24; Age/Grade Range: 4-12yo
And it is this fierceness that Powell has lacked throughout his career. While the best of the best in sprinting have typically been like high end muscle cars – think vintage Chevy Camaro’s, Dodge Charger’s and Shelby Mustang’s – Powell has been more like a Ferrari. Perhaps the fastest car on the road, but you don’t really want to race it against that supercharged Corvette Z1, because like Brian O’Connor in “The Fast and the Furious” you’ll be saying “I almost had you” while the engine is ready to fall on the ground! And that’s where Powell’s career has been to date. Perhaps the fastest car on the road, but a bit delicate for the big races against the supercharged and muscle cars.
Friend Banner
These exercises were not easy. Overhead lunges. Squat thrust jumps. Plank rows. Power jacks. (And believe me, much more.) Seriously hard breathing, egregiously sweating, heart pounding, unfun.
All forms of arrogance lie well beyond the pale of true spirituality, because arrogance attempts to fill our inner emptiness with ego rather than allowing that emptiness to blossom into humility. Freedom from arrogance begins with seeing. At first we may only receive hints from how our behavior affects those around us.
While we were at your appointment, the doctor agreed to do your 15 month checkup a few days early. Your 15 month stats are:
How does one do this? Perhaps others can leave room for mystery–but the best that I can do is recognize that at no point in time can one tell every aspect of a story… because telling a story is a perspective on events… and as limited beings we cannot ever really see all perspectives in a story.
Of course, any excuse to give Bruce Boxleitner work is good in my book.
It’s fabulous because we were together and we talk about everything from lonely hearts to female incontinence and laugh and commiserate and do some cheerleading and a little dime store philosophizing and we always leave each other feeling better and stronger; understood and loved. And what is more fabulous than that?
-Paula White
day and night are totally governed by the sun.
“Meat… this is just supposed to be a fantasy, a kink. You’ve crossed a line into madness,” he raises his gaze to meet hers but the act is entirely worn away now, she’s furious.
glued.....
Interested in what I used on this card? Here is a recipe...
An amusing note: male clergy were responsible for many of the restrictions imposed upon women, hence the male clergy as buffoons in Austen’s novels, like Mr. Elton in Emma and Mr. Collins and Pride and Prejudice.
Kids and glue don't really mix well, and depending on the glue it can get quite stressful for the kids, mainly because they want their creations last week, and waiting for glue to dry doesn't always go down well.
One time, probably 6 months ago, we went to a little shop near Sam's office called Wicked Waffle. A fun, tasty little place that has sandwiches, but the bread is waffles, and sweet waffles with berries and nutella. (Not a drop of syrup in the place!) Bria always begs to go to Wicked Waffle, so I thought this was the perfect opportunity. We picked up a couple waffles and took them to Sam's work, where he took a little break to eat them outside with us.
Here is the layout I created.
3 tablespoons orange juice concentrate, thawed
TV has given us the illusion that anarchy is people rioting in the streets, smashing car windows and looting every store in sight. But there’s also the polite, quiet, far deadlier anarchy of the core citizenry—the upright citizenry—throwing in the towel and deciding it’s just not worth it anymore.
I started with a base of Pumpkin Pie and layered with black bazzill and some Very Vanilla embossed with Gootchi Script EF. The next panel is more black bazzill punched with the Fleur de Lis border punch and topped with Material Girl DSP. Below that I added some black satin ribbon. Next I stamped the Tigerlily from Flourishes' A Year in Flowers 2 stamp set in Memento Tuxedo Black onto X-press It Blending Card and coloured with Copics - YR12, YR16, YR18, G12, G14, G16.
set your feet apart and read the people
Miller E, Cradock-Watson JE, Pollock TM. Consequences of confirmed maternal rubella at successive stages of pregnancy. Lancet 1982; 2: 781-784.
Don't forget to empty the garbage. Next time you're picking up cleaning supplies, find a box of great smelling fabric softener and throw a sheet into the bathroom garbage to freshen up the scent. It doesn't have to be brand name, it just has to smell good.
Yeah, for me it’s only good at the right times.
I must just add this as an after thought
Since it is dead, I must die
At 14% it's a belter - quite extracted, with a big hit of spicy oak - but some good ripe blackcurranty fruit to balance it. A Napa-style Cabernet at half the price. It would be perfect with a steak or any other hunk of well grilled meat.
But Ms Dial of the True and Robust COP Loyalist is speaking out against it, she wants mayorship or nothing….Ms Dial, Prakash the Gonad-less has already accepted nothing…..so while I admire your fortitude, trust me, the “Eat Ah Food” posse in the COP going to hunker down and chew harder and faster.
Telling us about roofs
We see Hishamuddin congratulating the police for maintaining order and preventing rioting. And warning people not to claim that the police attacked the rakyat.
I’ll admit that I’m not Liam’s biggest fan, I don’t think he’s got a great voice and I much prefer the vocals of Noel in his solo work and stuff with ‘The High Flying Birds’. But when I listened to Noel open the set with ‘Hello’ I wasn’t so much taken aback by the song as I usually am. I know – as I’m sure most people do – that Noel is the man behind the songs, the artist, but Liam brings the swagger, the front and the iconic sound of the band. I’ve always thought Noel is a better singer and I still do, but at the time of recording in 90′s Noel wasn’t as a confident a singer as he is now (self admittedly) and maybe that’s what Liam really brought to thee band of the 90′s.
The last two things we will have to enamel before the show. This weekend will be the last weekend of enameling then it is prep, prep, prep for the show.
This week’s issue definitely lives up to it’s namesake as Eric’s Gracious Plenty! It’s SO BIG…we needed to do something different. That’s why this issue is written in a different format. Some of you may remember it…while others will not. Don’t worry…you will still be able to catch up on everything you missed!
As we think about interpreting the prophets, there are several things to keep in mind.
future
It was the first day of the fifth grade when best friends Mitch and Rob met the girl of their dreams. Her name was Leslie and she was gorgeous. Both boys masterfully kept their cool around Leslie while they shared her as their new best friend.
We scour the kitchen and gather the scrappy, the limp, the sprouting, the freezer-burned, and the long-forgotten odds and ends.
There is a Wolf Craig (No 380 824) deep in the Grampian Mountains, but that ludicrously remote location can be instantly discounted. Two other contenders around Stirling do not even appear on the OS maps. They are Wolf’s Hole Quarry near Bridge of Allan and Wolf Craig in Stirling. Of them, Wolf’s Hole Quarry is the superior option in terms of the type of site that was used by the Societies for field preaching, as it lies on the edge of Ochil Hills and sits on the boundary of Stirlingshire and Forfarshire. However, both sites near Stirling can probably be discounted, as they lie at quite distance to the north of both Renwick’s support base and any other site where he is known to have preached.
I love the spring! It's 75 degrees, the trees are sprouting leaves, and SXSW is a mere 11 days away!!
It may sound strange, but human eyes never see the same image twice. An object such as a cat can produce innumerable impressions on the retina, depending on the direction of gaze, angle of view, distance and so forth. Every time our eyes move, the pattern of neural activity changes, yet our perception of the cat remains stable.”
Here are the Ten Steps to Enjoying Wine:
We have our passports! In addition to them, we got everything besides the cash back. We had already canceled all but one of the cards ( including, it turns out, one that was not with is, or at least not returned). Thankfully, we had not canceled one of them because of issues getting online access. That means that we also now have access to money. So, while we lost a day under very stressful circumstances, and thus will not be climbing the mountain we came here to climb ( where taichi was invented, by the way), we will be continuing on our way, only marginally worse for wear and with a broadened appreciation of the possible kindness of (Chinese) strangers.
5 minutes later, Tish realized I was not waking up. She ran back in to get me. In a stupor, I stumbled out of the house until my senses were overloaded. The blaze was larger than anything I’d ever seen. Thank God, the firemen put it out quickly. Fortunately, no one was hurt. A black hole existed where a third floor once was. The firemen were chopping open the roof and the walls, looking for any hiding flames. We came back inside and laid in bed, eyes wide open. It was so close. I wanted to stay up until the trucks left to make sure the trouble was over. Tish vowed to get rid of everything we own except 10 things. We’ve got some work to do.
One of the main takeaways from the luncheon for me was that good marketing not only requires the science of research, planning, implementation and analysis, but the art of building relationships over time, connecting with customers, matching product offerings to customer needs, and finding out what works best for one’s own particular marketing mix.
There’s a wide range of prices out there in the digital world. As news organizations are trying to figure out just how to make a profit from a product that consumers are still grasping on to the memory of being free, there’s been many variations of what to do.
Destined to Overcome It is my prayer that you will allow the Lord to bless you with abundant life, great joy, and a fresh wind of strength that will carry you and your family through to victorious days ahead! To help you, my husband and I have created a Web site that sends out daily prayers and scriptural encouragement for parents, family and friends of children with special needs.
No Time
-olive oil
I've always adored hats. Women look beautiful in hats. They carry themselves differently too. Backs are straighter. Voices are more ladylike. It's very difficult to act badly in a good hat.
You will stand there today and bow your head
In December 2008 Lady Butler-Sloss, England's first female Appeal Court judge, called for ministers to change the law for Muslims, so that a decree absolute could not be issued by a civil court until evidence had been obtained of a Sharia divorce.
I have previously written about curb appeal being essential in attracting a potential buyer as the outside of a house reflects what is on the inside. A poor outside appearance sends a negative message about the interior condition and is a sign of poor maintenance and hidden problems. For all you buyers out there – do take note of everything you see. It is easy to be captivated by a home’s decor and wonderful staging but do not let this distract you from the fundamental details.
have weighted my life!!
It totally amazes me that we are so driven that we lose our health to make money and then we turn around and spend all our money trying to get our health back. It does not have to be this way.
Yup, pretty sure we went back for seconds of this at the end of the night. Just so you know, McCormick and Schmick’s, we put our poker chips in your pail! Also, I liked (at least) the tattooage that was goin’ on with the chefs. But I digress…
Um… wouldn’t the highest recommendation be playing time with the Tide?
“I have a dream that my four little children will one day live in a nation were they will not be judge by the color of their skin but by the content of their character .”
Shaman have always been the versatile healing class, and I think that’s what Blizzard liked. We are the jacks of all trades, master of none. A shaman can pick up the tank healing or do heavy AOE raid healing without much sweat. Can we tank heal as well as a paladin or disc priest? Nope. Can we raid heal as well as ah holy priest or druid? Nope. We can, however, do either job as required of us, and so a resto shaman is a powerful healer in a team environment.
Cast : Anne Hathaway, Jim Sturgess, Tom Mison, Jodie Whittaker, Tim Key, Rafe Spall, Joséphine de La Baume, Patricia Clarkson, Ken Stott, Heida Reed, Amanda Fairbank-Hynes, Gil Alma, David Ajala, Georgia King, Ukweli Roach
“I don’t want chicken to feel bad. I will free you, but you must be good, understand?” said Bantum to the chicken, and put him down. Chickenhiemer, with no particular intention to go anywhere began pecking at seeds on the cave floor.
Oh how he made her felt so sad because she can no longer see love in his eyes.
The girls be’ind the bar they laughed an’ giggled fit to die,
And trust me, I used that face a lot.
Burger King announced that they are changing its recipe for the first time since 1998. This time they will take a gamble on potatoes.
No kidding.
I feel unsatisfied but I think it is because of all the work and nothing to show for it. The foot dragging, the not interested atmosphere, there are more important things to worry about search/work ethic. Maybe it's just because the book ended. There is no solution. Lots of work and overtime and it all ends with nothing. The writing is strong and the frustration came off the pages.
“Anyone can call themselves a beer expert,” Steamworks co-founder Kris Oyler said in a news release. “But when consumers want just the right beer, they usually need assistance from a server who really knows beer flavors, styles and brands. A Cicerone can assist.”
Question
Fast forward a couple years. After church one day, I sat at lunch with my friend Doug Clark, who at that time also played trumpet at Stevens Street. By God’s providence, Doug (the far better trumpeter!) received a phone call during our lunch together recruiting him to go and serve on the music staff at a place in New York called CAMP-of-the-WOODS. Pretty much on a whim, I decided to audition, too, and we both spent the summer using our God-given musical gifts to serve the Lord at this Christian resort.
See you on the flip-side.
― Thomas A. Edison
As a parent I’ve discovered many things about myself. One of which, is the fact that I truly love children’s literature. The best part of my day is story time. Every night before my children go to sleep, we spend time cuddling in my bed with a good book. Recently, story time has changed a bit. We have graduated from picture books such as The Very Hungry Caterpillar to chapter books like Harry Potter and the Magic Tree House Series. Therefore, when I was recently approached to review Journals of the Big Mouth Bass I was thrilled. I thought it would make a great addition to our story hour and I knew my children would like it.
When I picked up Ethan this week Ms. Crystal was so excited to tell me that Ethan knew the words 'flower', 'bumble bee', 'block', and 'boots' - actually he seems to be jibber jabbering more and more and some things are coming out clearer and clearer!! Oh and he started to say 'NoNo' for Nolan!!!! :) This didn't necessarily make Nolan happy so we had to remind Nolan that it was too hard for Ethan to say Nolan, but remember when his friends called him NoNo? Then he was okay.
I would say it is a combination of those summers in St. Louis at that theatre with my grandparents and dressing up in my grandma's clothes from her fancy days in the 50s and 60s that jump started me on the road to vintage.
Of course this Sunday after a failed attempt I started wondering if the pattern would once again reveal itself. The pattern of sex maybe once every third month. I did tell her that I was enjoying the new pattern, and could not go back to the sex maybe 5 times a year one, and she agreed but that did not help the situation.
Me (matter of factly): Because I am a princess. Princesses have 3 rings.
The marina is ram-jam full of yachts and cruisers of all shapes and sizes - I'm in an alien world here which has its own language and looks incredibly complicated. Look at all those ropes for a start.
The leaves upon her falling light --
In truth it’s so hard to achieve even one of these things that it seems incredibly churlish to admit to the dark side of writing success. The fact that it's all a bit frightening. But I suspect it’s the fear that stalks the whole process that stops many people from getting started at all.
It has been depicted as a battle between the Obama administration and the Catholic Church. However other religious leaders from other religious denominations have strongly objected to the issuing of the new regulations.
Alice Brady In Old Chicago
Among all the other things that go into showing, I immediately contacted my brilliant graphic designer to put together an "invitation." Her designs always make me smile and never fail to make me feel like I'm putting Society Social's best foot, rather face, forward. Not to mention we are so in sync, I swear she can read my mind! Despite having a pretty invitation to send out to the world, I held on to it. My mom took the liberty of sending it to a press room where it's probably sitting with a bajil others, "safely" hidden under stacks, but as for me, I didn't tweet it. I didn't blog it. I didn't instagram or even Facebook it. For all that know me, that is comparable to the grass being blue and the ocean green. As a small business, new no less, with minimal funds for heavy duty advertising and PR, I know I must be on top of my social media game to even have a fighting chance.
It was fun spending the day with my parents walking through shops, choosing clothes for me. I needed a tie, so we ended up buying a shirt , two ties, and a T-shirt. Typical.
intending to land on them.
Posted by Patrick & Amanda at 10:19 PM 0 comments
I would recommend this book to Mormons. This is a good book for quick reference or sharing difficult to explain beliefs with non-believers. This book is also a great reference for those wanting to know more about the LDS faith. This is a heavy book. It takes time to read through but it is worth it if you are seeking a better understanding of Mormonism.
09. The Revolution In Me
René & Jess
- is about art, art is about describing the world and art is about the maker
The many local government branches who were told that they could not make recommendations to their own members about Single Status deals without legal opinions informed by detailed equality impact assessments will doubtless be as confused as I am by the fact that - if the deal to be struck is a horrendous capitulation to a reactionary Government in a way which is contrary to the interests of all our members - we no longer need to insist upon such an equality impact assessment.
The giant turns to Djoran, who stands painfully on one good leg, her right hand clutching her left arm, which is drooping disturbingly from the shoulder socket.
The Blair Witch Project’s simple brilliance took the horror world by storm way back in 1999. It took my husband by storm a little later than that, probably somewhere around 2001. It has been sporadically terrifying him ever since. His fear on the Blair Witch front can largely be seen as twofold – scary ghost witches and nature. The truth is we’re not country people, hiking, camping, even gardening, are things that happen to other people, other people who are clearly mad. We are definitely soft city folk, we like comfort and convenience and indoor plumbing. Immersing oneself in sundry flora and fauna is stuff best left to David Bellamy, or that pigtailed kid from Little House on the Prairie, it’s not for the likes of us. Needless to say the very premise of The Blair Witch Project is immediately the stuff of pure, primal horror in our house. For my husband, The Blair Witch is a nightmare from the outset in terms of location but beyond that, once the fledging filmmakers get lost and the spooky noises and flickering shadows start kicking off, he generally dissolves into the couch displaying all the spinal fortitude of a particularly cowardly mollusc. The enduring problem for him with The Blair Witch Project is the corner-staring screamy ending, it leaves him bereft and bewildered searching for answers that just aren’t there, like a small child who’s just been punched by Santa.
I haven't read the Marc Strange or David Whellams books yet, but my guess is they're up the usual high ECW standards (present company excepted and all that..) and I know for sure that Mike Knowles and Brent Pilkey are very, very good and also worth hearing live, so to speak.
“Aghdgoma” in Georgian, it’s the celebration of Christ’s resurrection.
Dinner around the fire at Kori’s fed a casual crowd who arrived and departed with comfortable fluidity. Kori had whipped up a huge batch of her famous Thai soup — a tangy, coconut-milk based soup with galangal, Thai chilis, mushrooms, sweet corn, shrimp, and cilantro. Ever considerate of her guests’ palates, she made one pot at full strength spiciness, and a second pot with less of a kick.
Called God’s special woman or man.
I always feel kind of weird in my walking gear (long-sleeved tee, board shorts, runners) when I'm out shopping, but they know me at this store so I don't get followed around like I'm a crazy style-less person. Heh.
Hope you have enjoyed your visit and Thanks for any comments! I really do appreciate it so much!
So I have experienced somewhat the various levels of West meeting North and I still can't see how it may be resolved. I would hope that the villages would take control of the tourist industry in their neighborhood, take the reigns so no one else can drive them. But the village leaders are hard pressed to have nothing to do with tourists be they benign or not. And so we are left with this weird dance of frustration and reliance, of feeling guilty of living in a world that will have outsiders coming in. Of hating the new stuff and loving the new stuff. Its a time of birthing pains with emotion and logic warring in our Inupiaq Psyche.
When I was struggling with cancer, I was asked repeatedly to release my anger at the injustice of having cancer. Quite honestly, I felt a great many things—fear, pain, anxiety, frustration, uncertainty, exhaustion—but I did not feel that having cancer was unjust. When was I or anyone promised perfect health? An ant can struggle for yards with food in its mouth only to have a dead limb tired of hanging on crush it. What makes human beings presume to be exempt from such things?
It's too dark to put the keys in my ignition,
But I will say this…Women, rise up and sing with your lives and leadership. Live your servanthood as men have done in following Christ. And love all as Christ does his Church.
Have you made moussaka?
Because execution dates aren’t set until an inmate’s final appeal is denied, and the U.S. Supreme Court takes its recess in June, officials don’t anticipate having to make a decision regarding the lethal injection drugs for several months, Massie said.
I'm so happy! The weather here in Võru is great and I'm packing my bags so that I can go to Tartu today and have a fun weekend with my boyfriend and friends :)
In the mean time...
The House met again this week after a 3.week break. Monday the main business was the Commons amendments to the Legal Aid Sentencing and Punishment of Offenders Bill, which was sent back to the Commons for a send time, with some of our amendments reinstated, including the one that removed the deduction from awards made by the court to claimants suffering from mesothelioma of 'success fees' and After the Event Insurance. After that I attended the Baha'i annual reception but didn't stay very long because my legs hurt if I stand for any length of time.
From what I can remember from our discussions and personal research, our culture is predominantly patriarchal, yet matriarchal by nature.
"These reductions occurred both in mothers who smoked and those who had never smoked."
Get a free trial of Lookout Premium (optional). When your trial ends, automatically return to the free version. No credit card is required for the free trial!
The heart and the soul, of a poet unknown
Breed Specific Legislation is largely discriminative, basing most restrictions on physical appearance. Many breed laws turn to physical characteristics to define their bans, with descriptions of “pit bulls/dangerous dogs” often including but not limited to: muscular, medium sized, short hair, big head. This results in over inclusiveness, and puts a wide range of dog types at risk to be restricted – no matter their behavior. It also lets dogs that are actually dangerous but don’t happen to look like a “pit bull” slip under the radar.
A 1994 review of the book 1994? and evaluation of its impact on the Family Radio ministry gives more insight into Camping’s leadership style, and the situation back then. Excerpt:
Those of you who know me know I like to bake CAKES!
Nothing came to me
Well, actually ... yes, there is, Councillor Coleman, if you care to wander along the high street in North Finchley. Take a look in the window, in Cafe Buzz, where local shopkeepers' spokeswoman Helen Michael has thoughtfully provided some entertainment in the window, on a wide screen tv.
Knowing how he avoided me like the plague when I get angry, I did not expect a response. So I was surprised when 4 minutes later, I got a long text from him saying ‘Think we have some issues. Cause we just can’t be doing this all the time and we have to move on somehow. Just like you, I have to sort my stuff out and since I can’t speak to you about it I am in a bit of a pickle*. So, lets take a step back and see how to sort this out.’
My daughter received Brooke the golfer, whom loves to drive it off the tee! Besides Brooke the golfer I honestly loved every single one of the girls. I love that the girls encourage young girls to want to get out and get active, which teaches our girls to take care of their bodies. Since, my little girl does a lot of the activities that each girl portrays, the one thing she really loves to do is play golf. So, I knew Brooke would be the best for her.
I love how modern, flattering, and original the shape is, but what really makes it is the color. Who wouldn’t die for that cobalt? Purple is my favorite color, and this purple-on-the-verge-of-blue is drool-worthy. And those shoulders. Epically elegant, fresh, and chic. The structure and tight fit on top gives a nice contrast to the looser bottom. And we all know that fashion is all about contrast. The seams in the dress make for some beautiful lines. This is pretty much everything I’m looking for in a Prom dress: it’s not strapless, it photographs well, it’s not tacky, cheap, or tasteless like most dresses designed to be for Prom. I hate it when companies think that just because I’m a teenager, I have no sense of what looks good, and I’ll buy a horrible Prom dress just because the label says it’s for teenagers, not adults. Excuse me for wanting to look classy. Like this dress. This is a classy dress. Does it say it should be worn for Prom? No. Would that stop me? Absolutely not. But the price probably will. It’s $400 just to rent it, and the real deal goes for $3,500. Sigh.
-Waking up throughout the day-finding your meditation practice and sticking to it.
Descendez pour la version française.
2010.08.23 Iraq Baiji 7 0 Suspected al-Qaeda shoot seven oil workers to death.
“Better to understand a little than to misunderstand a lot.”
Guns and ammo found on foreign couple who don’t live in Laventille or Beetham, nor do they resemble Brig John Sandy…..
September 29, 2009
Provencal life is earthy and the bunches of garlic are practical table decorations... but the 'detail' has moved and now our focus is on the reflection of the garlic and the china....Again the light makes something so simple become quite luminescent....
Lyme disease effects everyone differently. It’s one of the reasons there is such debate about it in the medical community. With the wealth of evidence showing chronic Lyme exists, it is tricky. I was a false negative for almost 20 years. So most doctors dismissed it, even though I KNEW it’s what I had. Other Lyme sufferers would say I can’t be doing what I am if I was truly suffering. I have fought this disease, mostly without medical assistance, for so long that I know what works for me, and what doesn’t. I CAN do physical activity as long as I build slowly and take it easy. I know I will be able to run an entire 5k someday. I will walk/run a 10k. But it will be harder than for someone without Lyme.
Ever since Madonna made the “Blond Ambition” fashion statement of turning underwear into outerwear, modern celebrities and celebrity-watchers alike have cultivated a passionate love affair with the centuries-old art of body shaping. A few decades earlier, we let it “all hang out” both figuratively and literally. Gone were the girdles and bullet bras of the 50′s – the bra burnings of the late 1960′s were destined to influence the fashion tastes of a new generation of women.
She spent the night on the front porch - only because I took pity on her when a storm brought loads of wind with the cold air that came through after the rain passed.
is in the car
Yes, I am completely knackered at the end of the day. And yes, I could eat the legs off a horse after a big session. And oh my lordy me yes, it hurts (today is Monday. My last session was Saturday. I'm only now starting to walk properly again...) But I've got three months of boot camp up my sleeve, and I intend on using them. Even though I know I won't be a supermodel by Christmas, as least I'll have buns of steel.....
I'm fed up with sweet stuff like Christmas cookies. Can't see them right now...
So I can't cook great, though I do at least try (and I won't talk about the time I was newly married and made "beef stew" that was actually a crockpot full of water, veggies and boiled hamburger meat, or the Lemon Square Disaster of 2005, or the Sugar Cookie Meltdown of 2010)
Amateur photographer, Rachel Copeland, is in trouble. An early morning wildlife shoot at the deserted Salton Sea, soon becomes a shoot-em-up. And she is the one being fired at. Held at gunpoint, and her male attacker demanding her camera, she fights back and escapes.
after which they loudly squealed for more;
Steve Windwalker
to capture your
I hope everyone has a great weekend!
Mix the green chiles and the black beans into the tofu scramble. Let cook about 5 minutes until all the ingredients are heated through. Stir in the cilantro. Serve while hot.
Enter Lord Alric, AKA: knight-in-freaking-hot-armor. It would be easy to let him protect her, but Jessica refuses to be a damsel-in-distress. Instead, she convinces him to teach her to swordfight. Somewhere amidst the grueling hours of training, she falls for his chivalry and playful smile. Could time have brought them together? And if so, why is everything conspiring to keep them apart?
Whose pride just could not be disguised;
nice thick sliced sourdough bread (kind of thinking I should have toasted it...)
The senator goes on to imply that HIV infection is low in the Apostolic Faith because the women are bald and do not dress up. This religion doesn’t believe in Western medicine and therefore they do not go to hospitals or clinics so how does the Senator make this assertion, what is he basing this information on?
It’s not to say there haven’t been steps made today. Whatever will happen between Soo Hyun and Ki Woo, at the least, it can be said they have cultivated a closeness.
So...I have one "Warm Fuzzy" done but I really need two to go to MN. Not sure I am going to get them done. My head is just full of gift ideas. Now to get them from my head to the work table!!!!
/ soapbox
Man I hate vaccuuming the house.
I’ve already declared my love for the Paris of the East, but there is just enough travel love left over for what is sometimes known as China’s Switzerland. Qingdao – a city of more than two million people that manages to feel like a small, easy breezy seaside town – was the location for a recent long weekend with some friends.
And so I thought if some Freemason developer can build his Titanic Theme Park, then fuckin, me, Daniel Pongo can build his fuckin “The Troubles” LazerQuest....but first....but first....you gotta spend money to make money – and when you gotta spend money you gotta have money – but when you don't have money you gotta steal money – and who we gonna steal money off? The banks. And who's gonna do it? Party Time, Ju-Ju Brush and Daniel Pongo...
I went down to my favourite wheat free muffin stop, and put my pain killers in my soy latte.
What a weekend!
I just need to start actually going over the material now, hardcore. Given that my exams begin in a little over 2 weeks, I need to start memorizing and practicing until I know all the material cold.
I saw these quails in the freezer at Whole Paycheck and decided it was time to try cooking them. Experimentation is good for the soul.
Glad that I live am I;
Someone working at Wal-Mart with seven kids, you are hurting us.
Joseph DiPilato, 57, New York, N.Y.
The room is flooded with light in the winter, as it faces south. It's cool in the summer, as the other part of the roof shades it in the afternoon. I will have a big L-shaped work surface under a window looking out at the woods and the river. I have tons of ephemera and all kinds of projects waiting to be made and I will have ready access to all my STUFF! Now I can get to work. (well, after that 15 percent next weekend!)
And the armies which are in heaven, clothed in fine linen, white and clean, were following Him on white horses.
The man has spent a year showing the American electorate a road map, pointing at a distant, radical destination. Only the deliberately blind could miss the signals, and only a fool would assume he’ll change direction once he’s in power. I feel his pain.
I am from the secret world of hayloft swings and pickles thiev'd from cold, dank cellars.
The preeminent Chicago pizza restaurant is Pizzeria Uno. In enterprise because 1943, their full-dish concoction was an immediate hit. And Pizzeria Due opened not lengthy after a block away. These days, you don’t have to come to Chicago to take pleasure in 1. The other well-known Chicago pie maker is Lou Malnati. His dad, Rudy, utilized to be the chef at Pizzeria Uno, and some feel he is the real inventor of the Chicago type. Lou opened his restaurant in the suburbs in 1971, and almost 40 several years later there are 30 places in the Chicago location. They’re noted for the flaky, buttery crust. If you can’t get to Chicago to take pleasure in one particular, they’ll ship one to you on dry ice.
Then, Olson quotes Philip Melanchthon (1497-1560) who defined synergism as “any belief in human responsibility and the ability to freely accept or reject the grace of salvation. Because of Melanchthon’s influence on post-Luther Lutheranism, many Lutherans throughout Europe adopted a synergistic outlook on salvation, eschewing unconditional predestination and affirming that grace is resistible. Later Arminian theology spread to England and the American colonies, largely through the influence of John Wesley and the Methodists. Numerous denominations are devoted to Arminian theology. These include many Baptists and all Pentecostals, Restorationists(Churches of Christ and other denominations rooted in the revivals of Alexander Campbell), Methodists(including the large Holiness movement).(P 14)
11) Sweet tea vodka
Yes, on Valentine's Day, 1912. Can't you just feel the love?
Fumaroles are volcanic vents spewing hot, sulphurous gases. As pretty as those white plumes might be, think billowing stench of rotten eggs. The place smelled nasty. Although I can’t say I enjoyed the odor, it certainly added to the surreal atmosphere, making Hverarönd unlike any other place I’ve ever been.
I know, right? I'm blogging. What's up with that?
The tech process is about to start, so these entries are going to start getting pretty short–but I’ll keep updating with pictures from the day’s activities! The costume ladies Ivy and Cindy decreed Monday “Margaritas Monday,” and while it seems a bit late in the process to initiate such a good idea, better late than never, I say:
I also found his 'Author's Note' at the end of the book entrancing. For Alan Brennert does not stint on his research or in telling us how real people (from Somerset Maugham to the original Charlie Chan -- Chang Apana) inspired him. He lists at least 60 books that were helpful in developing a "true" sense of Hawai'ian culture.
I decided to buy PL-EXPLORER-340 after noticing the sleek design. Actually, I ordered two, one for my wife. I used to own another brand but it was too bulky. PL- explorer fits to your ear …
Truth be told...I could be happy in any one of them. But something about Mothers day dinner in Tuscany, Napa or on the beach is calling my name! How about you? Don't forget to enter the giveaway for the beautiful crystal urn candle over at Art by Karena. Click here to visit and be eligible! Wishing you a fabulous day......
Basically, it fails - and it succeeds. Entirely simultaneously.
The wonderful creator of both the drink and the bonbons was chocolatier Paul Young, who taught us all about how best to enjoy whisky in our chocolate (the key being to add it cold, as part of a ganache, to avoid burning off the alcohol). He was also very patient whilst we all expressed, repeatedly, how good the hot chocolate was. I have no doubt that DBS & I will be making our way to one of his shops before too long to see what other wonders he’s created.
the party’s chances in the fall
Mr Griesel was driving in a Land Cruiser, and he is accused of chasing the worker and knocking him down, then following him to a shop, grabbing the complainant, pushing him against a wall and then against a vehicle, then
Money isn’t worth it.
This guy is all about maintaining a strong frame and controlling every step of the “getting to the next level/closing” process, so that the close and leveling is pretty much a no brainer “YES” from the woman. He’s not gonna come right out and ask you for the digies even though you know eventually he will. He’s not going to come right out and say you look “hot” or whatever. He’s not going to be TOTALLY direct about his intentions until he has you in the palm of his hands. You know ladies that guy where he is talking to you about everything under the sun and God knows what and you know he is going to try to level but he’s basically teasing you and all you can think about is saying “SHUT UP AND ASK FOR MY PHONE NUMBER ALREADY DAMMIT!”.
William and Kate do no agree.
and married him. They weren't in love with each other ... more
DEXTER (Showtime)
They own the right to the natural biological function we call birth.
So who won what... well there were loads and loads of fantastic entrys and your all so very tallented!
Tony Stark: Dr. Banner, your work is unparalleled. And I’m a huge fan of the way you lose control and turn into an enormous green rage monster.
Using GPS technology, parole agents will be alerted if any sex offender on active parole enters the state fairgrounds from July 14 through August 1.
190'Tis sure the hardest science to forget!
In case you aren't very familiar with Wilton, they sell some of the best baking and decorating tools around. Their product lines are comprehensive, their quality is high and their prices are quite reasonable. I have had some of their products for 5+ years, have used it heavily and it is still in great condition.
Espero que todos esten disfrutando de un buen Domingo, como yo, SOMBRAS, mmm, debemos tener cuidado, ya que podemos ver en nuestra sombra lo que no somos, o lo que pudieramos desear ser...
Tesla was not beyond pandering to the press although his party trick using AC was less grotesque. He would stand on stage and have himself wired up and allow electricity to pour through his body and not just ten or twenty volts:
So he tells me he will call me later, it was a Sunday… and around 8:00pm I get his text while I was at my fathers house. He tells me to meet him at the frame shop, and I leave my dads place to go meet up with William for the first time…
It’s when the van comes to an abrupt stop that Shannon makes the connection that this is the van that the New World Power is using to come after her. It’s also at this point that the other New World Power members begin to cross the street. But as they do, Shannon heads into the buildings on the other side in an attempt to make it to another alleyway. The driver of the van follows Shannon’s progress and notifies his fellow New World Power members on where to go. With this information, the two of them make their way after her, eventually making it into another alleyway. Upon reaching it, they find it deserted with no sign of their target.
Food cravings: I wanted a cold hot dog this week. Is that weird? Yes okay it is. Good thing we didn't have any in the house. Other than that I crave milk. All the time. I have always loved milk and we usually go through 1-2 gallons a week but in the last week I have gone through 3 pretty much by myself.
Then began the comments. The first one took us to task for not mentioning Roman or Orthodox Catholics. Say what??
like breakneck speed.
Hello ladies!
Some quick tips for those who want to get to Heaven –
October 5: If my son, Matthew, could buy me a football for every gift giving occasion, he would.
Memphis, Tennessee. An eclectic mix of music always marks the Beale St. Music Festival, which celebrates its 36th anniversary this round with a lineup that includes Jane’s Addiction, My Morning Jacket, Florence + the Machine, Evanescence, Primus, Girl Talk, Pitbull, Alison Krauss & Union Station, Megadeth’s Dave Mustaine and Herbie Hancock. (May 4 – 6)
Rating: 4/5 Well done second installment with actual character growth!
The only valid path for us now is to stand aside while it all crumbles away. Let those who continue to fantasize about a republic which never was throw themselves into that self-defeating breach. Save them if they are willing to learn, but let them go if they won’t. Eventually, evolution will do what it always does, which is to correct error and reward, in its painful way, reality and truth.
If animals were grazed too long on a particular location, plants would become vulnerable to environmental stresses. At the same time, without the presence of grazing animals to consume forages, overgrowth would die and could promote fires and desertification. Each needs the other to keep it in check.
Dear PNWers,
Saturday, January 15th, doors at 8pm, show at 9pm
After seeing how awesome the new bath visor worked on Z, she still refused to bathe. She then refused to bathe with mommy so we resorted to another sponge bath and hair wash in the sink :( Next time we will try for the blue bucket.
$240 can help provide transportation for twelve women in need of treatment
Any blog readers here also signed up with Amore package? Which are the classes that you all like to attend?
God loves you, even if we don’t feel it.
This Week: 320
Blogger was very good to me, and being a Blog of Note in 2008 gave me a taste of what the wider world of blogging was all about. It inspired me to write more, share more and try to hone my skills with storytelling, idea generation and even be cognizant of good old-fashioned grammar.
A lot of people take a good night rest for granted, but I have to say on the days that I don’t get enough sleep; I am more likely to not go to the gym. If I do go, it seems like a waste of time because I absolutely have no energy to work out and I end up not staying too long. Oh by the way, those are usually the days that I just feel like eating whatever. Therefore, make sure you are getting enough sleep to allow your body to recover and rest. This way, you will have the energy boost you need the next day to do what you need to do to stay on track.
I told you I have been making some software lately and now I finished one and I am sharing it!
Despite ordering the book 10 seconds (that's no exaggeration) after it was first announced on the blog back in the summer, it only arrived on my doorstep last week. And, even worse, it was left whimpering in the cupboard under the stairs for a whole day, after I'd tossed it there, thinking it was yet another Christmas present for my kids. Anyway I digress, it's a wonderful, wonderful book and I've been trying to read it slowly and savour it ever since, but it's difficult to do!
Booklet #2:
alligator bag
NC springs in like a savage gazelle, and there’s lots of gore and red bits and blood and limbs of fanatics everywhere, and it’s all FINAL EPIC BATTLE.
This still needs to be soaked and thwacked to set the twist. Unless I plan to use the yarn right away, I let my spun yarn pile up for awhile. For those times people stress me out and I could use a good thwacking session to let me frustrations out. Heaven help the person that put me in such a state if they interrupt me, or they might find themselves being thwacked with the yarn. (Thwacking is the process of setting and smoothing the twist by smacking the wet yarn against a smooth hard surface.)
My husband and I had Thai food plates and our girls shared a plate of sandwiches and french fries. It’s nice that Rub-ar-roon offers both Thai and western food options. The food came quickly and the pad see ew I had was delicious. I also enjoyed my Thai Lemon Tea. It was very refreshing after having walked in Grand Palace and Wat Po in a warm weather.
So far, out of the 26 people who have stepped up to the plate, no one has managed to clean it up.
Rosie, of course, has worked with Bill Rogers for years and is as fine a human being as has ever walked the earth.
I have a confession to make: I can’t seem to control my urges for a piece of this cake. Once I get started during breakfast, I keep slicing and savoring each bite ever so slowly, then I just keep wanting some more. I don’t think any other cake I’ve made has had this sort of effect on me. And did I mention it’s perfect with coffee?
What is TAST?
At the end of my last riveting post, we had just returned from NC. Let's take it from the top since then....
Myth #7 – Introverts are weird.
Over 50 activities (called experiences by the organisers) are planned in a wide range of unusual locations, nearly half of which half will be free. Partly in order to create a buzz, and partly to keep the curious away from certain sensitive sites before the event, all of the places remain a secret until you purchase (or reserve) a ticket.
Color copy at Staples :: $.59
2 sprigs of thyme
Surprisingly, we are on track to finish our lesson books mid-May, even with the time we took off for the move and the two week spring break... Here's what we've been up to lately:
And you can find Kris' thoughts on her chosen verse and see the rest of the creations by our design team right here. We have less than one week left for our design team call, so if you are interested in becoming a member of the Stampin' Sisters in Christ blog team, look for details on our home page.
This go-round, feel free to choose something that has some other colors in it, as long as the fabric reads your color. (Meaning, if you stand back to look at the fabric, there is no question as to what color it is.)
Equalization: Harper’s leaked booklet o’ troublesome quotes makes many references to health care and how Harper would much rather privatize the whole she-bang and wash his hands of helping the province. I sure hope all of you middle-class Con voters have a way to pay hundreds of thousands in medical bills on your own, should cancer strike you or your loved ones. I doubt equalization will go well in his hands; his funds get allocated to his ridings and the rest be damned.
Anyhoo – the patience paid off. The old family room dresser came up to the Bub’s room, and I am in LURVE:
** I used Panko instead and it gave the chicken a really nice crunch!
1 tsp black pepper
Here are the Zoya polishes;
National Academy of Sciences. (1994). Management and disposition of excess weapons plutonium. Committee on International Security and Arms Control. National Academy Press, Washington, D.C.
Change – the process is simple. It begins with your desire. You have to want to change… but that isn’t enough. Billions of people want to change and never will. You have to make a decision to change, commit to it, pursue it relentlessly, and follow through.
to raise our understanding and overall IQs,
Here is what you need to do to be eligible to win:
Monday night was incredible. I went out with my street kids. It always amazes me how much they trust us. How much they’re willing to tell us. We did some good. We got a kid back to a refuge who’d taken a bad hit. He was dozing off at intervals. We helped another young man; a heroin addict & prostitute. Apparently he also crushes & injects oxycontin. He looked so unwell, sallow skin – evident even under the moonlight. Cuts & scabs up his arms; even he isn’t sure how he got them. He took us to ‘the rooms’ in Kings Cross; a safehouse for prostitutes to work from – to find a mate of his to get some paperwork back. It was just so heartbreaking. He looks so…disconnected from life. His affect flat.
overall the singer was “well
Thank you to everyone who took the time to Hippity Hop Through our TWO-DAY Blog Hop Celebrating our Savior's Birthday with us!
As, I said we will be offering 2 prizes. The first prize is for 4 images from the store. The 2nd prize is only if you submit a project using one of our images along with the challenge. If you do so, then you will be eligible to win 1 image from our store and a Guest Design Team Spot.
We arrived at 2 pm at a farm out on the Hereford - Brecon road, where a load of people were arriving with cat baskets and dog crates and boxes and basically anything suitable to carry away hens.
"I have no idea," she said.
In China common small talk may start with "Have you eaten?" I like this one (perhaps because I'm poria). It insinuates getting invited in for a meal or going to eat somewhere yummy, although it's more of a polite thing to say than attached to any real expectations.
Black Pudding would make his second appearance soon and as it stood, Moon didn't have any Mod dogs to join him in his beach fight tomorrow! The year old Whippet was getting desperate and he made his feelings known by parking his bum beside his master and barking loudly.
In the mid 90's Jackyl were unfairly lumped into the hair metal category along with acts like Damn Yankees and Slaughter. Actually they were a Southern rock boogie band from Georgia that formed in 1990. They had a well crafted blend of hard rock, Southern boogie and power tools. The fivesome shared an enthusiasm for AC/DC, Lynyrd Skynyrd, and other like-minded artists.
1 solved
They must, essentially, reawaken some of what they were born with—the God-given, inexplicable, ultimately undefeatable capacity to move in the direction of their own, unique interests, abilities, beliefs and dreams.
Last week, in a Caterpillar factory in Grenoble, three of the company's management staff were bailed up in their offices and held hostage for over 24 hours by irate workers who had just learned they had lost their jobs.
(Text Box comment Page 14)
Things will work out - in time a way will be found ...
But why defect now? Quite frankly, it is an absolute waste of my time and energy to be in a party that I criticise more than I defend, that I’m frankly embarrassed to campaign for, and that has gone so far from the Thatcherite principles that made me wish become a member in the first place. I was utterly sick of it. I cannot, in my heart of hearts, go up to a member of the public and tell them to vote Conservative because a majority Conservative government would be the best thing for them to have, because I simply don’t believe that anymore. The latest budget was an utter farce on top of a string of policies that have failed to cut taxation to aid growth and put money back in the pockets of the people the government are so determined to take from. The recent affront on civil liberties in regards to internet privacy is a disgusting U-turn from a party that campaigned so strongly against Labour’s stance on freedom in opposition. Ten billion pounds given to the IMF, a veto that turned out to be nothing of the sort; the list of left-wing authoritarian tendencies this government has displayed is endless. I would rather be “shouting from the sidelines” than betraying my principles on a daily basis from within. If this is childish, or cowardly, then feel free to label me as such, but I feel that I am doing the right thing. Waiting around for the Conservative party to go back to how it was under the days of Margaret Thatcher has become increasingly pointless when I know that there is a political party out there that believes in the same things that she and I do.
Respite. I found it. I am going to use it. For Faith. For the other kids when needed. Sure, go ahead, look at me like I have two heads and wonder why in the world I would use something like that...something like respite. Respite is defined as a temporary rest period, utilized by caregivers of the ill or disabled. Six kids. Two with ADHD. One with Tourette's. One with Down syndrome. One typical teenager. Judge me if you want, but to make myself a better "caregiver" to my daughter AND all of the the other children, I am choosing to do this for them and for myself.
By sanding, after paint is dty, you can add distressed areas,
Even though I declared that this show cannot be watched in my presence, I guess I'm not in their presence a whole lot, because they sure were excited when the wifey showed these to them:
Today, as I returned home via Allison’s generous Tania shuttling and supportive service, we saw a very large spotted lizard that looked just like a snake, but in fact it had legs that were very well camouflaged. I immediately, after the morning’s events of messages felt called to look up Lizard Wisdom, feeling it held another message for me and it indeed did. A few of these REALLY stood out and I especially resonated with the regenerative energy, especially in this collective 5 year of major transformational shifts both personally and collectively and after our 5-5-5 Full Moon energies.
When I was eight I devoured two lobsters, sweeping their shells into a bucket at my feet.
7:30: head home.
Gert here. Look at that ‘dig’ at our father who did give HO/JW up to adoption. Another tactic of HO/JW’s attempting to prove, somehow, that our father had a choice…she will not accept the fact that he did not. Nor will she accept the fact that Dad’s second wife was the one who said NO TO THAT INFANT. Why is it that Joan Wheeler can not accept that? Because her adoptive parents and family NEVER knew that was what happened, and, my father, SPARED Joan’s feelings but NOT TELLING HER. But JW is hell-bend on having her own versin of the truth, even coming out of the mouth of a imaginary man! More insults
We had a Salome number in our 2008 edition of the American Vaudeville Theatre, with Leela Corman doing the honors. She’ll be reprising it in our big exTRAVaganza in New York International Fringe Festival this August. And again, a revival of the version that started it all (apart from the Bible of course) is opening at the Flea tonight. Here’s Black Moon’s melodramatic infomercial:
One issues that often comes up when discussing portrait photography is whether or not the photographer should ask the subjects to smile. There are big snapshot-style smiles, big professional model-style smiles, small ("Mona Lisa") smiles, and no smiles.
So were does that leave me in all this? Is there a civil disobedient way to win this struggle against unemployment? No there isn’t. I do know I have to do two things: work towards a job and hope for a miracle. The miracle is not a job in this economy; that’s the struggle to keep moving towards and I do that every day and will continue to do so. The miracle I am hoping for is change. Not a change in the economy but a change in attitude. A miracle to change people’s greed into altruism. A miracle that the wealthiest 1% will realize that exploiting the rest of the 99% will not make anything easier for anyone in this country or the world. A miracle that we ordinary citizens will realize that we ARE a part of the 99% and NOT billionaires in training and quit working against our own self interests. A miracle that will stop creating more industrial complexes and start creating meaningful work. And a miracle that can change the hearts of the heartless and allow justice to flourish. Only then will things turn around. Only then will people once again feel proud of what they do and produce, and not feel like lemmings. Only then can the workers’ struggle be won once and for all. This is the miracle people are working for, pushing for. It’s why people were marching on may 1st and may still have to march for many for May 1sts to come.
Everybody buing buing
Losing ground at the speed of Sound
How adorbs is this family going to be?
Since I have always dreamed of making a sweater by designer Kaffe Fassett, that's going to be my project. I bought this book back in the 1980's and had felt that all his designs were above and beyond my skill level.
After the funeral I mingled amongst the guests and mourners drinking Earl Grey tea and eating egg or cucumber sandwiches. The widow, a dying breed of lady, greeted me as “Darling” and and I marvelled at the beauty which so many seventy year old English woman of her type possess. It was beauty she had passed on to her lovely grandsons, charming, handsome young white men, one in the army, another a doctor, married to white women who don't yet see the need to dress as trash.
We want to help these families!
Pure expectation when I poke you, and you kick exactly where I pushed.
He seized the opportunity to encourage Christians, especially more women to participate in politics in order to instill discipline and show good examples for the youth to emulate rather than leaving it to some politicians alone.
In my view there's an artificial argument brewing. Aren't we all just writers? Don't we all simply try to put the best possible words in the best possible order, and who the hell cares whether those words are delivered by paper, screen, bard, or pigeon?
LL Well one of the platforms that I show case deals with adoption and I’ve been adopted before. I’m aware of the whole adoption process and how stressing and tedious it can be. I figure I could talk about my life experiences through my music. I want people to think about what I’m trying to say rather than what’s just on paper.
He taught Janie to cook and how to do a whole lot of other things. She was even able to get her much needed high school equivalency diploma and then went on to the community collage.
The flowers were made from white card that I stamped with a Wendy Vecchi text stamp and then I used the Paper Artsy Scallop Flower die. I assembled the flowers and then used my new Melting Pot to coat them with UTEE to make porcelain flowers. For the leaves I blended Weathered Wood DI over some white card stock and then screwed it up to break the fibres. Then I used DI direct to the card and then ironed it on the reverse side. I used the Tattered Leaves die to cut the leaves out. The text is a Wendy Vecchi stamp that I've masked off and stamped each line separately.
Emily’s blog is a little less obvious, but I think it still ties in. Her blog is dealing with religious tolerance and, sadly, I think one of the main culprits in failing to assist the refugee population are religious conservatives. They often do a poor job of attempting to relate (this is seen firsthand in The Lost Boys of Sudan) to the struggles of the refugees. I think they believe that if they just Americanize the refugees then everything will be great, and that simply isn’t how it is. I once heard a religious conservative say that anyone who wishes to enter the country should be required to know English. I wanted to respond with a smart aleck comment like, “Well, please forgive my friend Borok for not knowing English… he was too busy running for his life trying to save his four kids from being killed by armed mercenaries hired by his nation’s government to kill him. He must have forgotten to take that English class with all the spare time he had….” Obviously, disrespectful approaches like that get one nowhere (and it’s exactly those kind of responses that necessitate Emily advocating for greater religious tolerance). But honestly, where is the love and compassion that religious people claim their religion teaches them? That is why Emily has to write her blog, which she is doing a very good job on so far, it’s very hard to maintain a proper respect for human beings when exposed to such ugly arrogance, and yet Emily does a good job of staying respectful while also being very pro-active in suggesting a way forward.
Here’s the scoop!
Auntie Mame (1958) ... TCM ... 12 AM
Alfred was not a poet, but a friend of poets, a playwright and a beloved figure, a truly legendary presence at Harvard University for generations of students. Born in Brooklyn to poor Irish parents, he was a sickly child. As his page at Brooklyn College indicates, he had had several heart attacks by age sixteen: it defies logic as to how he could have served in the U.S. Army during World War II. Never forgetting poverty that he and his family lived in, the discrimination that he had witnessed against the Irish, the sacrifice of his family, and the profound influence religious orders had on shaping his character and intellect, Alfred attended Brooklyn College and used the G.I. Bill to advance his education. Alfred received his Master’s at Harvard in 1949, his doctorate there in 1954, and he was made a full professor at the same institution in 1963.
What’s coming? The details of how the legislative changes will be implemented in the UK are yet as inknown. Although there seems to be a majority consensus on the proposals, they still have to be ratified by the European Parliament. Then, each member state will have another 18 months in which to make changes to their own legislation.
So said the woman standing near me at the lookout at the top of the Parc de Belleville. She was referring to the building on the left of this photo. A block of social housing. Built in the 1960s or 70s. Full of family homes, where children have grown up, where parents have become grandparents, where people have argued, laughed, cried, loved. Homes full of old photos, favourite toys, carefully chosen curtains and wallpaper.
As I travelled through station after station not only the landscape and air began to change but so did the people, they became whiter, and seemed more at one with their world than those where I had left that morning. They seemed, more relaxed, more confident and certainly more friendly and I knew why, for they are English, this was still England and it felt as if it would last forever.
And went into a thick forest,
You should know at the outset that I’m a massive fan of your work, and I teach “Upon This Rock” each semester, and love that piece like I love few other pieces of prose in existence, like a top-5 type thing.
IRIS retracts…
Another reason for watching it was that the movie was definitely in the back of my mind when I was writing Mister Creecher. The idea of teaming two misfits - one a teenager, the other a kind of superhuman - certainly had something to do with my memory of Terminator 2. In particular, the scene where John Connor realises that he can make the terminator do whatever he says. The glee with which he realises that he has a near-indestructible killing machine at his disposal is immediately tempered by his feeling of responsibility as soon as the terminator starts to act on his orders. I knew I wanted that tension to exist in my novel - although Billy never actually has control over Mister Creecher in that way.
I’ve never actually asked this of a parent who would fit the question because I imagine it would be met with a very bad reaction and they would probably assume I am very narrow-minded indeed. But I promise I’m not. I do know what I believe in and I stand firm in my convictions, but I like understanding things and this is one thing I have never been able to wrap my head around. I hope someday someone will answer this question of mine honestly and not defensively, because I don’t mean it as an attack.
And one more late entry, living up to her name Baking Addict has sent in something else - she just couldn't resist! She's very proud to have got the hang of macarons and I am just a little bit jealous as these raspberry and cream macarons look great!
with the whisper of his breath
“You will know, as it will know, and you will see…as you change, it changes.”
It transcends reality and sits on our shared chromosomes
"Don't tell me the moon is shining; show me the glint of light on broken glass."
Sehun, who went through four years of training after being cast for the first time in 6th grade, picked a similar strategy. However, Sehun’s weapon was dance.
Versamark and then also embossed with WOW! Earthtone Honey regular.
- Yogurt Silhouette or Creamy 16 x 100 g $4.97 each (Danone)
I got an email from a reader questioning my choice to take two of my daughters for pedicures on their day off yesterday. I just want to take a moment to assure you that I'm not squandering money on spa days. The little nail salon by me offers specials on Mondays and I really wanted to do something special for Lexi especially, who breaks down crying several times a week, but won't complain or ask for a thing. Yes, I'm aware that I can spend special time with my kids without spending even the little bit that the pedicures cost. But sometimes, a little something that puts a smile on my kids' faces in the midst of turmoil and pain is worth more than you might imagine. And, in case anyone was wondering, I've gotten many gift cards for restaurants and stores, as well as donations of money, with the instructions, "Please use this to do a little something for your kids", or "Please use this to put a smile on the kids' faces and add a little fun back into their lives."
We also drove through the Columbia Ice Fields, but did not stop to take a bus tour through the area.
We're all glad, pathetically glad, to see them, but we're still pinned in the wreckage, with petrol dripping into our hair, and we can't feel one of our legs.
Being called a good girl/boy means we have something to live up to. Bringing up the question: were we not good enough already?
Daniel: We see you wearing a lot of Le Coq merchandise, are you in any way an ambassador of the brand, and if so how did you get it? Phela le rena we want these connects (lol).
In addition to the traditional registry, we would LOVE cash gifts on our wedding day (or before, if that’s what tickles your fancy) to contribute to our Honeymoon. If you are out of town and would like to send a monetary gift, you can mail it to:
At each conference we hold seminars (questions, conversation,
And, so there. And.
Evans remains a major asset. His team remains in a major funk. When a franchise finishes near the conference cellar for six consecutive seasons, the general manager needs to make significant personnel changes, or the franchise needs to change its general manager.
A Season of Eden and mousepad.
There are those that say the Occupy Wall Street movement lacks a central message. They are wrong. People are protesting because they are tired of having their wallets squeezed when they buy gasoline or groceries. The people are fed up with predatory lending practices and draconian bank fees. The people have had it with being priced out of higher education.
Emma Waine's beautiful abstract piece, Indian Details. She's our youngest artist, fearless, and very much a rising star. . . .
And hold both within His right hand which is strong.
"In terms of human history, before the last glacial maximum people were living with wolves or canid species in widely separated geographical areas of Euro-Asia, and had been living with them long enough that they were actually changing evolutionarily," said Hodgins. "And then climate change happened, human habitation patterns changed and those relationships with those particular lineages of animals apparently didn't survive."
Understand the customer lifecycle: Integration of audience data from multiple sources makes it possible to correlate customer attributes and interests, replacing a scattershot approach to marketing with more targeted, effective, and memorable multiple-channel campaigns. By transforming big data into customer intelligence, you realize increased opportunities to drive revenue throughout the customer lifecycle.
The following day she had her first basketball game here in Pullman and scored her very first basket!!!!
One day we took the number 29 from La Boca to Palermo, crossing the city from south to north. We got on near the beginning of the route, so got good seats, and watched 45 minutes of a day in the life of a Buenos Aires bus. The interior is nearly as good as the exterior. The driver's cab is bedecked with rear view mirrors, leaving not a corner of the bus out of his sight. The mirrors are decorated, their edges bevelled with geometric floral patterns, Romany caravan style. This kitsch homely decoration makes for a great combination with the otherwise fairly utilitarian bus interior.
Mathematician and Fields Medalist Tim Gower has boycotted Elsevier and started a website for others to publicly declare their own boycott.
I have to say this was a bit on the raunchy side for me. There’s nothing like trying to read on the train & praying that the man next to you can’t see any of the words on the pages you’re reading!
It's humbling to write about my experience here, to claim any authority as a San Franciscan. I love this place and do my best to do right by it, but there's so much I'm either yet to or will never know.
As the salmon is the star of the dish, I urge you to use the freshest fish you can find. Kathryn actually caught the one we served (see the picture of her with her fish below the recipe) when she went fishing this summer in Tofino (she went with Jayne's Addictions Charters) and I almost always only eat salmon that Kay's caught on the Skeena River with his brother. The flavour of the fish is just stunning in this dish, and if you're not a salmon lover, this might just be the dish to change your mind :-)
Henry pours a Riesling.
Police raided the camp in 2006, removing placards showing graphic images of dead and mutilated children. Haw told Reuters at the time that he was being persecuted for his opposition to the then prime minister Tony Blair’s government.
Adjust: None.
Fun facts about Gil Hodges:
But the point that i would like to understand and also know from you recruiters out there is how do you tackle such situations. I know most of you might say that we need to have back up offers and 2nd 3rd 4th Plan ready. But does it always help !!!! Also there have been a number of fourms where blacklisting the dropouts candidates was an option that’s picking up momentum. I’m not sure if this really works, May be, May be not.
The man's gaze fell on Sam and his hand holding the gun fell to his side. He backed up against the wall. Sam dug her fingers into Abby's arm, wanting to pull away from his stare, but was unable. Time hung, frozen and thick. Then the man dropped the gun to the ground with a clatter.
Not to mention, often times, emotional dishonesty requires more energy than emotional honesty and causes us to lose out on an authentic experience.
Go Link up =)
Said my Washington source late last night BST, “About the only thing that’s working well now is that Geithner and Lagarde are close. I guess she gave him the full strength on French banks. Now he’s scared, so he’s going to Poland”.
Leave an adorable baby puppy wrapped up in a blanket nestled in a basket at your enemy’s doorstep. What is cuter than a baby puppy? A baby puppy wrapped in a blanket nestled in a basket, that’s what! The sight of this sweet little puppy would make anyone feel better, unless you lace the baby puppy’s basket and sleeping basket with a highly contagious and fatal biological weapon such as anthrax or smallpox that is!
“These islands were never safe. They’re too hard to leave quickly, too hard to escape from. It was foolish of us to come here.”
How could passengers be at risk when something like a clumsy propeller spins off, hits the fuselage, tears through the side of the plane and then falls to the ground?
Since lately I've been feeling really unwell, I mentioned my neck pains before, I'm still on anti inflammatory, pain meds and physio appointments. So when I felt nauseous I thought well my poor body is constantly breaking down medicines and putting up with pain, no wonder I'm not feeling 100%.
Serve With Yogurt and naan.
It’s a little bit like that, living away from your family. You visit, there’s a babbling baby. You return, the baby has morphed into an articulate boy with a penchant for singing the theme songs from Marvel superhero cartoons.
So, seriously... what are you waiting for?!
NOW NOW NOW NOW.
was the language.
7. Tom turkey
Yes, the Knitting and Crochet Blog Week is over, sniff sniff. But really, look at that topic. Isn’t it perfect?
Dear Daddy.
Raymond Massey shows up as the heavy, his Lincoln-esque features made up to look like those of Boris Karloff--who originated the role of Jonathan, but was prevented from carrying it over to the screen due to his obligations to continue the part on stage. Despite the absence of the man for whom the part was written, Massey imbues Jonathan with a sinister menace that is a wonderful counterpart to the flighty, ever-incredulous antics of Grant as Jonathan's put-upon brother Mortimer.
Andrew Zimbalist- Finance & Development, March 2010, Volume 47, Number 1
I did feed him because I felt kinda bad. Not really but since the theme for the Kulinarya Cooking Club is Love hosted by Abigail of my Nappytales and Marni of Kensington Kitchen, I figured I could do something nice for him. We hardly have any meals with pork due to my authority but for him, I made pork chops. He orginally requested I make some longoniza sausages but I ran out of time so I did the next best thing. I created my take on longoniza pork chop. I did accidently poured too much annatto seed but it resulted in a bright red color.
Alan Chapell recalled the first meeting he had with Mr. D’Aquila while he was taking summer school classes in 1984 to try to get into Stamford Catholic after "literally failing out” of another local high school. After Alan had a run-in with another teacher and was kicked out of class, Mr. D'Aquila confronted him.
is made on a stretchable bungee cord, which allows texting and viewing
Here's what the rest of us do:
In July 2009 Your Mama discussed Mister Morton's previous residence, a low-floor condo at the star-packed Sierra Towers building at the western edge of the Sunset Strip where West Hollywood turns to Beverly Hills. At that time Mister Morton had the 1,845 square foot bachelor pad, once owned by kooky artist/movie star/raw milk drinker Vincent Gallo, listed at $2,895,000, far less than the $3,500,000 he paid for the place in January 2007.
But, I'm editing first to add - thank you! The feedback from yesterday was very helpful. I really appreciated it!
Building A Winning Business by Tom Salonek is useful for its pragmatic approach ($9.95, softcover, http://www.intertech.com/) as it focuses on 70 “takeaways” that will improve anyone’s management skills. Based on his own experience and his father’s advice on how to work with people, the author shares how he grew his own company from $2 million in annual revenue to more than $10 million, despite the burst of the technology bubble and the worst recession of our time. He offers succinct, good advice on the fundamentals of hiring and managing employees, identifying top talent, and weeding out those with poor performance. I have seen a lot of books filled with management advice, often twice or three times as thick as this one, but this book delivers the goods. Joe Banda asks whether you are a leader and then answers with his book, You are a Leader ($14.95, Langdon Street Press, softcover). A slim volume, the book uses historical and political examples of why anyone can become an effective leader by tapping qualities they have, believing in themselves, and taking charge. It is a conventional book of unconventional wisdom that explores ten intangible qualities that exist in everyone.
The Yale commission’s decision to shut down YIISA is a typical behavior for American academics, promoting anti-Zionism and rather Pro-Islamism, while attacking criticism of antisemitism and Islamism. If we look at public counter-intellectuals like Tony Judt, Norman Finkelstein, Noam Chomsky, Judith Butler, Daniel Boyarin, all those Institutes for Middle Eastern Studies, Islamic Studies, Area Studies (or Gender Studies, Philosophy etc. etc.), not to forget Obama’s and Edward Said’s ally Rashid Khalidi: hatred of Israel, anti-Zionism, along with affirmation, trivialization or downplaying of Muslim antisemitism, are conventional wisdom for many elites in the US, especially scholars in the related fields.
We are so grateful to all of you, both here in person and here in spirit, who have offered such kind words and prayers for Jake and for us.
Who is Woman?
I think I had more I wanted to say, but I’m getting tired…
The decision was reached at a meeting between the coup leaders and the leaders of 22 of the 35 parties that had made up the opposition to the government that was toppled last Thursday.
“YOU remember to lock the doors SIS! Chhhhuuuuhhhh!”
One that you are eerily drawn to in every store- even Goodwill?
There is one more thing… They tell you that… In some cases death may occur.
Sorry this took so long. I’m moving on Friday so I’ve been very busy.
Sorry I've been M.I.A.
Next up is a great piece that John Cena wrote about granting wishes with the Make-A-Wish Foundation. The kids love him, and with good reason.
I suppose we should count our lucky stars that The Daily Mail hasn't got hold of this, they would have a field day.
Aiport Ber will not now be open for the busy summer traffic.
Fig and Blue Cheese Appetizers:
i can’t.
Angel sweet
Will these bullies grow up believing that society will tolerate the abuse of an adult with Autism because their school tolerated the abuse of a child with autism?
Zermatt Unplugged
Hey Y'all,
MBR: Good question! The biggest lesson is simply to never give up. I love Mark Twain’s quote about the difference between people who succeed and people who fail is that the ones who succeed never give up. I believe that, one hundred percent. Three elements? Never. Give. Up.
In the UK we apparently have a drought. As a result of this we have a hosepipe ban. This is to stop me from using much needed water to keep my grass green.
